California, session 20252026, AB2796.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2736 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2736. (a) An applicant for licensure as a registered nurse shall comply with each of the following:(1) Have completed general preliminary education requirements as shall be determined by the board.(2) Have successfully completed the courses of instruction prescribed by the board for licensure, in a program in this state approved by the board for training registered nurses, or have successfully completed courses of instruction in a school of nursing outside of this state that, in the opinion of the board at the time the application is filed with the board, are equivalent to the minimum requirements of the board for licensure established for an approved program in this state.(3) Not be subject to denial of licensure under Section 480.(4) (A) The board shall require an applicant for licensure as a registered nurse to undergo a fingerprint-based state and national criminal history background check.(B)  The board shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for individuals specified in subparagraph (A) who are subject to a state and national criminal history background check, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state- and federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105.(b) An applicant who has received their training from a school of nursing in a country outside the United States and who has complied with subdivision (a), or has completed training equivalent to that required by subdivision (a), shall qualify for licensure by successfully passing the examination prescribed by the board.SECTION 1.SEC. 2. Section 4606 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4606. (a) Prior to issuing a certificate to an applicant, the council shall require the applicant to undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history background check.(b) The council shall submit the fingerprint images and related information to the Department of Justice pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.(c) The Department of Justice shall provide a state response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.(d) The council shall request subsequent arrest notification service from the Department of Justice, as provided under Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code, for all applicants for certification for whom fingerprint images and related information are submitted to conduct a search for state-level criminal offender record information.(e) The council is authorized to receive arrest notifications and other background materials about applicants and certificate holders from a city, county, or city and county.SEC. 2.SEC. 3. Section 6533.5 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:6533.5. (a) The bureau shall require an applicant for licensure as a professional fiduciary to undergo a fingerprint-based state and national criminal history background check.(b) The bureau shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for an individual specified in subdivision (a) who is subject to a state and national criminal history background check pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.(c) The Department of Justice shall provide a response to the bureau pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.(d) The bureau shall request from the Department of Justice subsequent arrest notification service, as provided pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code.SEC. 3.SEC. 4. Section 22253.5 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:22253.5. (a) Beginning July 1, 2020, as a condition of registration, the council shall require the applicant to submit fingerprint images as directed by the council and in a form consistent with the requirements of this section.(b) The council shall submit the fingerprint images and related information to the Department of Justice for the purpose of obtaining information as to the existence and nature of a record of state-level convictions and of state-level arrests for which the Department of Justice establishes that the applicant was released on bail or on their own recognizance pending trial pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.(c) The Department of Justice shall provide information to the council pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.(d) The council shall request subsequent arrest notification service from the Department of Justice, as provided under Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code, for all applicants for registration for whom fingerprint images and related information are submitted to conduct a search for state-level criminal offender record information.(e) The council may receive arrest notifications and other background materials about applicants and registrants from a city, county, or city and county.SEC. 4.SEC. 5. Section 14502 of the Corporations Code is amended to read:14502. (a) (1) (A) (i) On and after July 1, 1996, no entity, other than a humane society or society for the prevention of cruelty to animals, shall be eligible to petition for confirmation of an appointment of any individual as a humane officer, the duty of which shall be the enforcement of the laws for the prevention of cruelty to animals.(ii) On and after July 1, 1996, only a person who meets the requirements of this section may be appointed as, or perform the duties of, a humane officer.(iii) Any person appointed as a humane officer before July 1, 1996, may continue to serve as a humane officer until the expiration of the term of appointment only if the appointing society maintains records pursuant to subparagraph (B) documenting that both the appointing society and the humane officer meet the requirements of this section.(B) Each humane society or society for the prevention of cruelty to animals for which an individual is acting as a humane officer shall maintain complete and accurate records documenting that the individual has successfully completed all requirements established in this section and shall make those records available, upon request, to the superior court, the Attorney General, or any entity duly authorized to review that information, including the California Animal Welfare Association. The records shall include the full name and address of each humane officer.(2) The humane society or society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shall possess insurance of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000) for liability for bodily injury or property damage.(3) Each appointment of a humane officer shall be by separate resolution by the board of directors or trustees of the humane society or society for the prevention of cruelty to animals duly entered in its minutes. The resolution shall state the full name and address of the principal office of the appointing society, the full name of the person so appointed, the fact that the person so appointed is a citizen of the State of California, that the person so appointed has met the training requirements set forth in subdivision (h), and whether the person so appointed is authorized to carry a weapon pursuant to this section. The resolution shall also designate the number of the badge to be allotted to the officer, and the date on which the term of office shall expire.(b) A humane society or a society for the prevention of cruelty to animals seeking confirmation of a humane officer’s appointment shall comply with each of the following provisions:(1) (A) Before filing a Petition for Order Confirming Appointment of a Humane Officer under paragraph (3), a humane officer applicant shall undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history background check.(B) A city, county, and city and county humane society or society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for humane officer applicants pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state and federal response to a government entity pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state response to a nongovernmental entity pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.(C) The submitting entity shall request from the Department of Justice subsequent arrest notification service, as provided pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code, for persons whose appointments are confirmed as described in subdivision (c).(D) The Department of Justice shall charge a fee sufficient to cover the cost of processing the request described in this paragraph.(2) When filing a Petition for Order Confirming Appointment of a Humane Officer under paragraph (3), the humane society or society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shall serve a copy of the petition on each of the following:(A) The police department having jurisdiction in the city in which the principal office of the appointing society is located.(B) The sheriff’s department having jurisdiction in the county in which the principal office of the appointing society is located.(C) The Department of the California Highway Patrol.(D) The California Animal Welfare Association.(E) The animal control agency having jurisdiction in the city in which the principal office of the appointing society is located. If the sheriff’s department or police department entitled to notice under subparagraph (A) or (B) provides animal control services for the city in which the principal office of the appointing society is located, no separate notice is required under this subparagraph.(F) The Department of Justice.(3) The humane society or society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shall file with the superior court in and for the county or city and county in which the principal office of the humane society is located a Petition for Order Confirming Appointment of a Humane Officer, and shall attach to the petition all of the following:(A) A copy of the resolution appointing the person, duly certified to be correct by the president and secretary of the society and attested by its seal.(B) A copy of the criminal record offender information, if any, obtained regarding the person pursuant to paragraph (1).(C) Proof of the society’s proper incorporation in compliance with Part 9 (commencing with Section 10400) of Division 2, including the date the articles of incorporation were filed with the Secretary of State.(D) A copy of the society’s liability insurance policy for bodily injury or property damage in the amount of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000).(E) Documentation establishing that the appointee has satisfactorily completed the training requirements set forth in this section.(F) Documentation establishing that the society has a written agreement with another entity, such as a public or private animal shelter or licensed veterinary clinic, that (i) provides for the humane care and treatment of any animals seized by the society, (ii) is capable of preserving evidence that may be used to prosecute an animal cruelty case, and (iii) is compliant with all applicable federal, state, and local laws, including licensing laws. Alternatively, the society may provide documentation that it is operating its own animal shelter that meets the requirements of clauses (i), (ii), and (iii).(G) If the society has not previously appointed a humane officer:(i) An affidavit signed under penalty of perjury from the president of the society that demonstrates the society’s competence to appoint a humane officer by providing information, including, but not limited to, the following:(I) Partnerships or collaborations, if any, with other nonprofit or community agencies.(II) Cash reserve on hand, if any, to pay for veterinary expenses, housing, food, and care of seized animals.(III) Established donor base, if any.(IV) Current or prior law enforcement, legal, or other relevant experience, if any, of persons who will supervise the appointee.(V) Current or prior experience of managers, if any, in operating a society or other nonprofit organization.(VI) Statement that each board member is in good standing in the community and has not been convicted of a misdemeanor or felony involving animals.(VII) Ongoing training beyond the minimum required for appointment of the humane officer, if any.(VIII) The need for a humane officer in the society’s county.(IX) Any other documentation demonstrating compliance with applicable federal, state, or local laws.(ii) Affidavits, if any, from personnel of local animal control agencies, law enforcement agencies, or other societies pertaining to the appointee’s fitness to act as a humane officer.(H) As the last page, proof of service of a copy of the petition upon those parties required to be served.(4) Any party described in paragraph (2) may file an opposition to the petition described in paragraph (3). All papers filed in opposition to the petition and in reply to the opposition shall conform to law and motion pleading requirements, pursuant to Rule 3.1113(d) of the California Rules of Court. An opposition shall not exceed 15 pages and a reply shall not exceed 10 pages, excluding exhibits and declarations. The opposition shall be limited to the competency of the society to appoint and supervise a humane officer and the qualifications, background, and fitness of the appointee that are specific to the work of a humane officer.(A) Any opposition shall be filed no later than 15 court days after the petition is filed with the court. Any opposition shall be served on all parties indicated on the proof of service attached to the petition.(B) The petitioner’s reply, if any, to the opposition shall be filed within 10 court days after service of the opposition. The reply shall be served on all parties listed in the proof of service attached to the petition and to any other person who has filed an opposition.(C) The court shall rule on the petition without a hearing unless the court notifies the parties of an intention to hold a hearing.(D) The petitioner shall serve a certified copy of the court’s order ruling on the petition on all parties listed in the proof of service attached to the petition and to any other person or entity who has filed an opposition.(c) (1) Upon receipt of the Petition for Order Confirming Appointment of a Humane Officer, the court shall first determine the society’s date of incorporation, and the length of time between the date the society filed its articles of incorporation with the Secretary of State and the date it filed the petition described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) with the court. If the society was incorporated on or after January 1, 2011, the following shall apply:(A) For a petition to confirm appointment of a level 1 humane officer, the court shall issue an order denying confirmation of the appointment if a minimum of five years has not elapsed from the date the society filed its articles of incorporation with the Secretary of State to the date it filed the petition.(B) For a petition to confirm appointment of a level 2 humane officer, the court shall issue an order denying confirmation of the appointment if a minimum of one year has not elapsed from the date the society filed its articles of incorporation with the Secretary of State to the date it filed the petition.(C) For a petition to confirm appointment of either a level 1 or level 2 humane officer, the court shall issue an order denying confirmation of the appointment if the society has not established, through submission of appropriate documentation, that the society is either operating its own animal shelter or has a written agreement with another entity, in compliance with subparagraph (F) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b).(2) If the court has not issued an order denying the petition pursuant to paragraph (1), the court shall review the matter of the appointee’s qualifications and fitness to act as a humane officer. The court shall also consider any documentation it has received in support of, or in opposition to, the confirmation of the person’s appointment. If the court finds that the appointee is qualified and fit to act as a humane officer, the court shall issue an order confirming the appointment. The society shall thereupon file a certified copy of the court order in the office of the county clerk of the county or city and county in which the court is located. The appointee shall, at the same time, take and subscribe an oath of office prescribed for peace officers. The society shall also provide a copy of the Order Confirming Appointment to the California Animal Welfare Association and the Department of Justice. The Department of Justice may charge a reasonable fee sufficient to cover the costs of maintaining records of Orders Confirming Appointment. If the court does not find the appointee qualified and fit to act as a humane officer, the court shall issue an order denying confirmation of the appointment.(d) If the court grants the petition, the county clerk shall immediately enter in a book to be kept in the county clerk’s office and designated “Record of Humane Officers” the name of the officer, the name of the society appointing the officer, the number of the officer’s badge, the date of the filing, and the case number of the court order confirming the appointment. At the time of the filing, the county clerk shall collect from the society a fee of five dollars ($5), which shall be full payment for all services to be performed by the county clerk under this section.(e) All appointments of humane officers shall automatically expire if the society disbands or legally dissolves.(f) (1) The society appointing an officer may revoke an appointment at any time by filing in the office of the county clerk in which the appointment of the officer is recorded a copy of the revocation in writing under the letterhead of the society and duly certified by its executive officer. Upon the filing, the county clerk shall enter the fact of the revocation and the date of the filing of the revocation opposite the name of the officer in the record of humane officers.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), any duly authorized sheriff or local police agency or the California Animal Welfare Association may initiate a revocation hearing by filing a petition to Revoke Appointment of a Humane Officer. The petition shall show cause why an appointment should be revoked and shall be made to the superior court in the jurisdiction of the appointment. Filing, service, and format of the petition and any oppositions and reply papers shall conform to the law and motion requirements under the Code of Civil Procedure, California Rules of Court, and this code. A proceeding pursuant to this paragraph shall be a special proceeding within the meaning of Section 23 of the Code of Civil Procedure.(A) Notice of the hearing date and a copy of the petition shall be served in the same manner as a summons upon the humane officer subject to the petition, the society that appointed the officer, the agencies and association described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b); except the party filing the petition shall not be required to serve copies of those documents upon itself.(B) Upon a finding of good cause, the court shall issue an order granting the petition to revoke the appointment. The county clerk shall immediately enter the revocation and the date of the court order opposite the name of the officer in the record of humane officers. The clerk of the superior court shall give notice of the order to the parties described in subparagraph (A) and to the county clerk-recorder.(g) The society appointing the humane officer shall pay the training expenses of the humane officer attending the training required pursuant to this section.(h) (1) (A) A level 1 humane officer is not a peace officer, but may exercise the powers of a peace officer at all places within the state in order to prevent the perpetration of any act of cruelty upon any animal and to that end may summon to the officer’s aid any bystander. A level 1 humane officer may use reasonable force necessary to prevent the perpetration of any act of cruelty upon any animal.(B) A level 1 humane officer may make arrests for the violation of any penal law of this state relating to or affecting animals in the same manner as any peace officer and may serve search warrants.(C) A level 1 humane officer is authorized to carry firearms while exercising the duties of a humane officer, upon satisfactory completion of the training specified in subparagraph (D), if the requirements in subparagraph (F) are met.(D) A level 1 humane officer shall, before appointment, provide evidence satisfactory to the appointing society that the officer has successfully completed the following requirements:(i) At least 20 hours of a course of training in animal care sponsored or provided by an accredited postsecondary institution or any other provider approved by the California Veterinary Medical Association the focus of which shall be the identification of disease, injury, and neglect in domestic animals and livestock.(ii) At least 40 hours of a course of training in the state humane laws relating to the powers and duties of a humane officer, sponsored or provided by an accredited postsecondary institution, law enforcement agency, or the California Animal Welfare Association.(iii) The basic training for a level 1 reserve officer by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 832.6 of the Penal Code.(E) A person shall not be appointed as a level 1 humane officer until the person meets the criteria in Sections 1029, 1030, and 1031 of the Government Code. A humane society or society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shall complete a background investigation, using standards defined by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training as guidelines for all level 1 humane officer appointments.(F) (i) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a level 1 humane officer may carry a firearm only if authorized by, and only under the terms and conditions specified by, the officer’s appointing society.(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a level 1 humane officer shall not be authorized to carry a firearm unless and until the officer’s appointing society has adopted a policy on the use of deadly force by its officers and the officer has been instructed in that policy.(2) (A) A level 2 humane officer is not a peace officer, but may exercise the powers of a peace officer at all places within the state in order to prevent the perpetration of any act of cruelty upon any animal and to that end may summon to the officer’s aid any bystander. A level 2 humane officer may use reasonable force necessary to prevent the perpetration of any act of cruelty upon any animal.(B) A level 2 humane officer may make arrests for the violation of any penal law of this state relating to or affecting animals in the same manner as any peace officer and may serve search warrants during the course and within the scope of appointment, upon the successful completion of a course relating to the exercise of the police powers specified in Section 832 of the Penal Code, except the power to carry and use firearms.(C) A level 2 humane officer is not authorized to carry firearms.(D) A level 2 humane officer shall, before appointment, provide evidence satisfactory to the appointing society that the officer has successfully completed courses of training in the following subjects:(i) At least 20 hours of a course of training in animal care sponsored or provided by an accredited postsecondary institution or any other provider approved by the California Veterinary Medical Association, the focus of which is the identification of disease, injury, and neglect in domestic animals and livestock.(ii) At least 40 hours of a course of training in the state humane laws relating to the powers and duties of a humane officer, sponsored or provided by an accredited postsecondary institution, law enforcement agency, or the California Animal Welfare Association.(E) A person shall not be appointed as a level 2 humane officer until the person meets the criteria in Sections 1029, 1030, and 1031 of the Government Code. A humane society or society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shall complete a background investigation, using standards defined by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training as guidelines, for all level 2 humane officer appointments.(3) During each three-year period following the date on which the certified copy of the court order confirming the appointment of a humane officer was filed with the county clerk, the humane officer shall complete 40 hours of continuing education and training relating to the powers and duties of a humane officer, which education and training shall be sponsored or provided by an accredited postsecondary institution, law enforcement agency, or the California Animal Welfare Association. A certificate of compliance shall be served no later than 21 days after the expiration of each three-year period on the Department of Justice with copies served on the superior court, agencies, and associations described in subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive, of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b). The Department of Justice may charge a reasonable fee sufficient to cover the costs of maintaining records of certificates of compliance. The certificate of compliance shall also include documentation that the humane society or society for the prevention of cruelty to animals is in compliance with subparagraph (F) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b). Service on the Department of Justice shall be in compliance with procedures set forth by the Department of Justice. The Department of Justice shall post the filing procedures, as they may be updated from time to time, on its internet website. Failure to file the certificate of compliance with the Department of Justice no later than 21 days after the expiration of a three-year period shall result in immediate revocation of the appointment.(4) If the humane officer is authorized to carry a firearm, the officer shall complete ongoing weapons training and range qualifications at least every six months pursuant to subdivision (t) of Section 830.3 of the Penal Code. A certificate of compliance pursuant to this section shall be served no later than 21 days after the expiration of a six-month period on the Department of Justice with copies served on the superior court, and on the agencies and associations described in subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive, of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b). The Department of Justice may charge a reasonable fee sufficient to cover the costs of maintaining records of certificates of compliance. The certificate of compliance shall also include documentation that the humane society or society for the prevention of cruelty to animals is in compliance with subparagraph (F) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b). Service on the Department of Justice shall be in compliance with procedures set forth by the Department of Justice. The Department of Justice shall post the filing procedures, as they may be updated from time to time, on its internet website. Failure to file the certificate of compliance with the Department of Justice no later than 21 days after the expiration of a six-month period shall result in immediate revocation of the appointment.(5) (A) A humane officer may carry a wooden club or baton if the officer has satisfactorily completed the course of instruction certified by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training in the carrying and use of the club or baton pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 22295 of the Penal Code.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a humane officer may carry a wooden club or baton only if authorized by, and only under the terms and conditions specified by, the officer’s appointing society.(i) Every humane officer shall, when making an arrest, exhibit and expose a suitable badge to be adopted by the society under this part of which the officer is an appointee which shall bear its name and a number. Uniforms worn by humane officers shall prominently display the name of the appointing society. Humane officer uniforms shall not display the words “state” or “California,” except to the extent that one or both of those words are part of the appointing society’s incorporated name.(j) Any person resisting a humane officer in the performance of the officer’s duty as provided in this section is guilty of a misdemeanor. Any person who has not been appointed and qualified as a humane officer as provided in this section, or whose appointment has been revoked as provided in this section, or whose appointment, having expired, has not been renewed as provided in this section, who shall represent themself to be or shall attempt to act as an officer shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.(k) No humane officer shall serve a search warrant without providing prior notice to local law enforcement agencies operating within that jurisdiction.(l) Any humane society, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals, or person, who knowingly provides a court with false or forged documentation for the appointment of a humane officer, is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000).(m) Except as otherwise provided by this section, a humane officer shall serve only in the county in which the court that appointed the officer sits. A humane officer may serve in another county if the humane officer gives notice requesting consent to the sheriff of the county in which the officer intends to serve, and acquires consent from that sheriff of the county in which the officer intends to serve, or from a person authorized by the sheriff to give that consent. A sheriff shall promptly respond to any request by a humane officer to serve in the sheriff’s jurisdiction and any request shall not be unreasonably denied.SEC. 5.SEC. 6. Section 33192 of the Education Code is amended to read:33192. (a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), if the employees of any entity that has a contract with a private school to provide any of the following services may have any contact with pupils, those employees shall submit or have submitted their fingerprints in a manner authorized by the Department of Justice together with a fee determined by the Department of Justice to be sufficient to reimburse the department for its costs incurred in processing the application:(1) School and classroom janitorial.(2) Schoolsite administrative.(3) Schoolsite grounds and landscape maintenance.(4) Pupil transportation.(5) Schoolsite food-related.(b) This section does not apply to an entity providing any of the services listed in subdivision (a) to a private school in an emergency or exceptional situation, such as when pupil health or safety is endangered or when repairs are needed to make school facilities safe and habitable.(c) This section does not apply to an entity providing any of the services listed in subdivision (a) to a private school when the private school determines that the employees of the entity will have limited contact with pupils. In determining whether a contract employee has limited contact with pupils, the private school shall consider the totality of the circumstances, including factors such as the length of time the contractors will be on school grounds, whether pupils will be in proximity with the site where the contractors will be working, and whether the contractors will be working by themselves or with others. If a private school has made this determination, the private school shall take appropriate steps to protect the safety of any pupils that may come in contact with these employees.(d) A private school may determine, on a case-by-case basis, to require an entity providing schoolsite services other than those listed in subdivision (a) or those described in Section 33193 and the entity’s employees to comply with the requirements of this section, unless the private school determines that the employees of the entity will have limited contact with pupils. In determining whether a contract employee will have limited contact with pupils, the private school shall consider the totality of the circumstances, including factors such as the length of time the contractors will be on school grounds, whether pupils will be in proximity with the site where the contractors will be working, and whether the contractors will be working by themselves or with others. If a private school makes this determination, the private school shall take appropriate steps to protect the safety of any pupils that may come in contact with these employees. If a private school requires an entity providing services other than those listed in subdivision (a) and its employees to comply with the requirements of this section, the Department of Justice shall comply with subdivision (e).(e) A request for records pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be conducted pursuant to Section 11105.3 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state and federal response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.(f) An entity having a contract as specified in subdivision (a) and an entity required to comply with this section pursuant to subdivision (d) shall not permit an employee to come in contact with pupils until the Department of Justice has ascertained that the employee has not been convicted of a felony as defined in Section 45122.1.(1) This prohibition does not apply to an employee solely on the basis that the employee has been convicted of a felony if the employee has obtained a certificate of rehabilitation and pardon pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 4852.01) of Title 6 of Part 3 of the Penal Code.(2) This prohibition does not apply to an employee solely on the basis that the employee has been convicted of a serious felony that is not also a violent felony if that employee can prove to the sentencing court of the offense in question, by clear and convincing evidence, that they have been rehabilitated for the purposes of schoolsite employment for at least one year. If the offense in question occurred outside this state, then the person may seek a finding of rehabilitation from the court having jurisdiction where they are a resident.(g) An entity having a contract as specified in subdivision (a) and an entity required to comply with this section pursuant to subdivision (d) shall certify in writing to the private school that neither the employer nor any of its employees who are required by this section to submit or have their fingerprints submitted to the Department of Justice and who may come in contact with pupils have been convicted of a felony as defined in Section 45122.1.(h) An entity having a contract as specified in subdivision (a) on the effective date of the act adding this section and an entity required to comply with this section pursuant to subdivision (d) by a private school with which it has a contract on the effective date of the act adding this section shall complete the requirements of this section within 90 days of that date.(i) For purposes of this section, “private school” means a person, firm, association, partnership, or corporation offering or conducting private school instruction on the elementary or high school level.(j) Where reasonable access to the statewide electronic fingerprinting network is available, the Department of Justice may request electronic submission of the fingerprint cards and other information required by this section.SEC. 6.SEC. 7. Section 33195.2 of the Education Code is amended to read:33195.2. (a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), if the employees of any entity that has a contract with a heritage school to provide any of the following services may have any contact with pupils, those employees shall submit or have submitted their fingerprints in a manner authorized by the Department of Justice together with a fee determined by the Department of Justice to be sufficient to reimburse the department for its costs incurred in processing the application:(1) School and classroom janitorial.(2) Schoolsite administrative.(3) Schoolsite grounds and landscape maintenance.(4) Pupil transportation.(5) Schoolsite food-related services.(b) This section does not apply to an entity providing any of the services listed in subdivision (a) to a heritage school in an emergency or exceptional situation, such as when a pupil’s health or safety is endangered or when repairs are needed to make school facilities safe and habitable.(c) This section does not apply to an entity providing any of the services listed in subdivision (a) to a heritage school when the heritage school determines that the employees of the entity will have limited contact with pupils. In determining whether a contract employee has limited contact with pupils, the heritage school shall consider the totality of the circumstances, including factors such as the length of time the contractors will be on school grounds, whether pupils will be in proximity with the site where the contractors will be working, and whether the contractors will be working by themselves or with others. If a heritage school has made this determination, the heritage school shall take appropriate steps to protect the safety of any pupils that may come in contact with these employees.(d) A heritage school may determine, on a case-by-case basis, to require an entity providing schoolsite services other than those listed in subdivision (a) or those described in Section 33195.3 and the entity’s employees to comply with the requirements of this section, unless the heritage school determines that the employees of the entity will have limited contact with pupils. In determining whether a contract employee will have limited contact with pupils, the heritage school shall consider the totality of the circumstances, including factors such as the length of time the contractors will be on school grounds, whether pupils will be in proximity with the site where the contractors will be working, and whether the contractors will be working by themselves or with others. If a heritage school makes this determination, the heritage school shall take appropriate steps to protect the safety of any pupils that may come in contact with these employees. If a heritage school requires an entity providing services other than those listed in subdivision (a) and its employees to comply with the requirements of this section, the Department of Justice shall comply with subdivision (e).(e) (1) The heritage school contractor shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice of all employees of entities, as identified in subdivisions (a) and (d), that contract with a heritage school, as defined in Section 33195.4, for the purposes of obtaining information as to the existence and content of a record of state or federal convictions and state or federal arrests and also information as to the existence and content of a record of state and federal arrests for which the Department of Justice establishes that the person is free on bail or on their own recognizance pending trail or appeal.(2) A request for records pursuant to this section shall be conducted pursuant to Section 11105.3 of the Penal Code.(3) The Department of Justice shall provide a state and federal response to the heritage school contractor pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.(f) An entity having a contract as specified in subdivision (a) and an entity required to comply with this section pursuant to subdivision (d) shall not permit an employee to come in contact with pupils until the Department of Justice has ascertained that the employee has not been convicted of a felony as defined in Section 45122.1.(1) This prohibition does not apply to an employee solely on the basis that the employee has been convicted of a felony if the employee has obtained a certificate of rehabilitation and pardon pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 4852.01) of Title 6 of Part 3 of the Penal Code.(2) This prohibition does not apply to an employee solely on the basis that the employee has been convicted of a serious felony that is not also a violent felony if that employee can prove to the sentencing court of the offense in question, by clear and convincing evidence, that they have been rehabilitated for the purposes of schoolsite employment for at least one year. If the offense in question occurred outside this state, then the person may seek a finding of rehabilitation from the court having jurisdiction where they are a resident.(g) An entity having a contract as specified in subdivision (a) and an entity required to comply with this section pursuant to subdivision (d) shall certify in writing to the heritage school that neither the employer nor any of its employees who are required by this section to submit or have their fingerprints submitted to the Department of Justice and who may come in contact with pupils have been convicted of a felony as defined in Section 45122.1.(h) An entity having a contract as specified in subdivision (a) on the effective date of the act adding this section and an entity required to comply with this section pursuant to subdivision (d) by a heritage school with which it has a contract on the effective date of the act adding this section shall complete the requirements of this section within 90 days of that date.(i) Where reasonable access to the statewide electronic fingerprinting network is available, the Department of Justice may request electronic submission of the fingerprint cards and other information required by this section.SEC. 7.SEC. 8. Section 44237 of the Education Code is amended to read:44237. (a) Every person, firm, association, partnership, or corporation offering or conducting private school instruction on the elementary or high school level shall require each applicant for employment in a position requiring contact with minor pupils to undergo a fingerprint-based state and national criminal history background check. Every employer shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for individuals specified in this subdivision who are subject to a state and national criminal history background check pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.(b) (1) As used in this section, “employer” means every person, firm, association, partnership, or corporation offering or conducting private school instruction on the elementary or high school level.(2) As used in this section, “employment” means the act of engaging the services of a person, who will have contact with pupils, to work in a position at a private school at the elementary or high school level on or after September 30, 1997, on a regular, paid full-time basis, regular, paid part-time basis, or paid full-time or part-time seasonal basis.(3) As used in this section, “applicant” means any person who is seriously being considered for employment by an employer.(4) This section does not apply to a secondary school pupil working at the school they attend or a parent or legal guardian working exclusively with their children.(c) The Department of Justice shall provide a state and federal response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.(d) An employer shall not employ a person until the Department of Justice completes its check of the state criminal history file as set forth in this section.(e) (1) An employer shall not employ a person who has been convicted of a violent or serious felony or a person who would be prohibited from employment by a public school district pursuant to any provision of this code because of their conviction for any crime.(2) A person who would be prohibited from employment by a private school pursuant to paragraph (1) shall not, on or after July 1, 1999, own or operate a private school offering instruction on the elementary or high school level.(f) An employer shall request subsequent arrest service from the Department of Justice as provided under Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code.(g) This section applies to any violent or serious offense that, if committed in this state, would have been punishable as a violent or serious felony.(h) For purposes of this section, a violent felony is any felony listed in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code and a serious felony is any felony listed in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7 of the Penal Code.(i) Notwithstanding subdivision (e), a person shall not be denied employment or terminated from employment solely on the basis that the person has been convicted of a violent or serious felony if the person has obtained a certificate of rehabilitation and pardon pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 4852.01) of Title 6 of Part 3 of the Penal Code.(j) Notwithstanding subdivision (e), a person shall not be denied employment or terminated from employment solely on the basis that the person has been convicted of a serious felony that is not also a violent felony if that person can prove to the sentencing court of the offense in question, by clear and convincing evidence, that they have been rehabilitated for the purposes of school employment for at least one year. If the offense in question occurred outside this state, then the person may seek a finding of rehabilitation from the court in the county in which they are a resident.(k) The commission shall make available to each private school a listing of all credentialholders who have had final adverse action taken against their credential. The information shall be identical to that made available to public schools in the state. The commission shall also send on a quarterly basis a complete and updated list of all teachers who have had their teaching credentials revoked or suspended, excluding teachers who have had their credentials reinstated, or who are deceased.(l) The Department of Justice may charge a reasonable fee to cover costs associated with the processing, reviewing, and supplying of the criminal record summary as required by this section. The fee shall not exceed the actual costs incurred by the Department of Justice.(m) Where reasonable access to the statewide electronic fingerprinting network is available, the Department of Justice may mandate electronic submission of the fingerprints and related information required by this section.(n) All information obtained from the Department of Justice is confidential. Agencies handling Department of Justice information shall ensure the following:(1) A recipient shall not disclose its contents or provide copies of information.(2) Information received shall be stored in a locked file separate from other files, and shall only be accessible to the custodian of records.(3) Information received shall be destroyed upon the hiring determination in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 708 of Title 11 of the California Code of Regulations.(4) Compliance with destruction, storage, dissemination, auditing, backgrounding, and training requirements as set forth in Sections 700 to 708, inclusive, of Title 11 of the California Code of Regulations and Section 11077 of the Penal Code governing the use and security of criminal offender record information is the responsibility of the entity receiving the information from the Department of Justice.SEC. 8.SEC. 9. Section 45125.1 of the Education Code is amended to read:45125.1. (a) Any entity that has a contract with a local educational agency shall ensure that any employee who interacts with pupils, outside of the immediate supervision and control of the pupil’s parent or guardian or a school employee, has a valid criminal records summary as described in Section 44237. When the contracting entity performs the criminal background check, it shall immediately provide any subsequent arrest and conviction information it receives to any local educational agency that it is contracting with pursuant to the subsequent arrest service.(b) (1) This section does not apply to an entity providing services to a local educational agency, as described in subdivision (a), in an emergency or exceptional situation, such as when pupil health or safety is endangered or when repairs are needed to make school facilities safe and habitable.(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an employee of any entity that has a contract with a local educational agency, and that offers work experience opportunities for pupils, including, but not limited to, opportunities pursuant to Section 51760, 52336, 52372, 52410, or 52460, Article 1 (commencing with Section 52300), Article 5 (commencing with Section 52381), or Article 7 (commencing with Section 52450) of Chapter 9 of Part 28 of Division 4, Chapter 16.5 (commencing with Section 53070) of Part 28 of Division 4, Article 5 (commencing with Section 54690) of Chapter 9 of Part 29 of Division 4, or Part 54.5 (commencing with Section 88820) of Division 7 of Title 3, or workplace placements as part of a pupil’s individualized education program, including, but not limited to, the services described in Article 3 (commencing with Section 56470) of Chapter 4.5 of Part 30 of Division 4, is not required to have a valid criminal records summary pursuant to subdivision (a) if all of the following requirements are met:(A) At least one adult employee in the workplace during the pupil’s work hours, who has direct contact with the pupil and has been designated by the employer as the employee of record who is responsible for the safety of the pupil, has a valid criminal records summary as described in Section 44237.(B) A staff representative of the local educational agency makes visitations as specified in a pupil’s individualized education program, or, if unspecified, at least once every three weeks to consult with the pupil’s workplace liaison, observe the pupil at the workplace, and check in with the pupil to ensure the pupil’s health, safety, and welfare, including by addressing any concerns the pupil has raised.(C) The parent or guardian of the pupil has signed a consent form regarding the pupil’s work placement, attesting that the parent or guardian understands the duties assigned to the pupil and the nature of the workplace environment.(3) If a pupil participates in services provided by a contractor as part of an independent study program and the pupil is under the immediate supervision and control of the pupil’s parent or guardian during the provision of those services, the local educational agency shall do either of the following:(A) Verify completion of a valid criminal records summary for all employees of the contractor who interact with the pupil.(B) Ensure that the parent or guardian of the pupil has signed a consent form before the pupil’s interaction with a person employed by the contractor, attesting that the parent or guardian understands that the person employed by the contractor has not completed a valid criminal records summary as described in Section 44237.(c) On a case-by-case basis, a local educational agency may require an entity with whom it has a contract to comply with the requirements of this section for employees in addition to those described in subdivision (a). The entity shall prepare and submit those employee’s fingerprints to the Department of Justice, as described in subdivision (a).(d) (1) The Department of Justice shall ascertain whether the individual whose fingerprints were submitted to it pursuant to subdivision (a), (c), or (h) has been arrested or convicted of any crime insofar as that fact can be ascertained from information available to the Department of Justice. When the Department of Justice ascertains that an individual whose fingerprints were submitted to it pursuant to subdivision (a), (c), or (h) has a pending criminal proceeding for a felony as defined in Section 45122.1 or has been convicted of a felony as defined in Section 45122.1, the Department of Justice shall notify the employer designated by the individual of that fact.(2) The Department of Justice, at its discretion, may notify the local educational agencies in instances when the employee is defined as having a pending criminal proceeding described in Section 45122.1 or has been convicted of a felony as defined in Section 45122.1.(3) A request for records pursuant to this section shall be conducted pursuant to Section 11105.3 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state and federal response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.(e) (1) An entity having a contract as described in subdivision (a) or that is required to comply with this section for other employees pursuant to subdivision (c) shall not permit an employee to interact with pupils until the Department of Justice has ascertained that the employee has not been convicted of a felony as defined in Section 45122.1.(2) The prohibition in paragraph (1) does not apply to an employee solely on the basis that the employee has been convicted of a felony if the employee has obtained a certificate of rehabilitation and pardon pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 4852.01) of Title 6 of Part 3 of the Penal Code.(3) The prohibition in paragraph (1) does not apply to an employee solely on the basis that the employee has been convicted of a serious felony that is not also a violent felony if that employee can prove to the sentencing court of the offense in question, by clear and convincing evidence, that the employee has been rehabilitated for the purposes of schoolsite employment for at least one year. If the offense in question occurred outside this state, then the person may seek a finding of rehabilitation from the court in the local educational agency in which the employee is a resident.(f) An entity having a contract as described in subdivision (a) or that is required to comply with this section for other employees pursuant to subdivision (c) shall certify in writing to the local educational agency that neither the employer nor any of its employees who are required by this section to submit or have their fingerprints submitted to the Department of Justice and who may interact with pupils have been convicted of a felony as defined in Section 45122.1.(g) Where reasonable access to the statewide electronic fingerprinting network is available, the Department of Justice may mandate electronic submission of the fingerprint cards and other information required by this section.(h) (1) For purposes of this section, an individual operating as a sole proprietor of an entity that has a contract with a local educational agency, as described in subdivision (a), shall be considered an employee of that entity.(2) To protect the safety of any pupil that may interact with an employee of an entity that is a sole proprietorship and has a contract as described in subdivision (a) or that is required to comply with this section for other employees pursuant to subdivision (c), a local educational agency shall prepare and submit the employee’s fingerprints to the Department of Justice, as described in subdivision (a).(i) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.SEC. 9.SEC. 10. Section 8908 of the Family Code is amended to read:8908. (a) A licensed adoption agency shall require each person filing an application for adoption to be fingerprinted and shall secure from an appropriate law enforcement agency any criminal record of that person to determine if the person has ever been convicted of a crime other than a minor traffic violation. The licensed adoption agency may also secure the person’s full criminal record, if any, with the exception of any convictions for which relief has been granted pursuant to Section 1203.49 of the Penal Code. Any federal-level criminal offender record requests to the Department of Justice shall be submitted with fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice for the purposes of obtaining information as to the existence and content of a record of an out-of-state or federal conviction or arrest of a person or information regarding any out-of-state or federal crimes or arrests for which the Department of Justice establishes that the person is free on bail, or on their own recognizance pending trial or appeal. The Department of Justice shall forward to the Federal Bureau of Investigation any requests for federal summary criminal history information received pursuant to this section. The Department of Justice shall review the information returned from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and shall compile and disseminate a response to the licensed adoption agency.(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), the criminal record, if any, shall be taken into consideration when evaluating the prospective adoptive parent, and an assessment of the effects of any criminal history on the ability of the prospective adoptive parent to provide adequate and proper care and guidance to the child shall be included in the report to the court.(c) (1) A licensed adoption agency shall not give final approval for an adoptive placement in any home in which the prospective adoptive parent, or any adult living in the prospective adoptive home, has a felony conviction for either of the following:(A) A felony conviction for child abuse or neglect, spousal abuse, crimes against a child, including child pornography, or for a crime involving violence, including rape, sexual assault, or homicide, but not including other physical assault and battery. For purposes of this subdivision, crimes involving violence means those violent crimes contained in clause (i) of subparagraph (A), and subparagraph (B), of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code.(B) A felony conviction that occurred within the last five years for physical assault, battery, or a drug- or alcohol-related offense.(2) This subdivision shall become operative on October 1, 2008, and shall remain operative only to the extent that compliance with its provisions is required by federal law as a condition of receiving funding under Title IV-E of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 670 et seq.).(d) Any fee charged by a law enforcement agency for fingerprinting or for checking or obtaining the criminal record of the applicant shall be paid by the applicant. The licensed adoption agency may defer, waive, or reduce the fee if its payment would cause economic hardship to the prospective adoptive parents detrimental to the welfare of the adopted child.SEC. 10.SEC. 11. Section 1300 of the Financial Code is amended to read:1300. (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 1051, 1052, and 1054 of the Labor Code and Section 2947 of the Penal Code, a bank or any affiliate thereof, licensed under the laws of any state or of the United States, may require a director, an officer, an employee, or an applicant for employment to undergo a fingerprint-based state criminal history background check.(b) If, upon evaluation of the criminal history information received pursuant to this section, the bank or affiliate determines that employment of the person fingerprinted would constitute an unreasonable risk to that bank or affiliate or its customers, the person may be denied employment.(c) Banks and their affiliates shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for individuals specified in subdivision (a) who are subject to a state criminal history background check pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.(d) The Department of Justice shall provide a state response pursuant to subdivision (o) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.(e) A bank or affiliate may request from the Department of Justice subsequent arrest notification service, as provided pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code, for persons described in subdivision (a).(f) Any criminal history information obtained pursuant to this section is confidential and no recipient shall disclose its contents other than for the purpose for which it was acquired.(g) “Affiliate,” as used in this section, means any corporation controlling, controlled by, or under common control with, a bank, whether directly, indirectly, or through one or more intermediaries.SEC. 11.SEC. 12. Section 17331 of the Financial Code is amended to read:17331. (a) An applicant applying for licensure as an escrow agent under this division is required to apply for a Fidelity Corporation Certificate, prepared and issued by Fidelity Corporation, for each proposed shareholder, officer, director, trustee, manager, or employee who is to be directly or indirectly compensated by the escrow agent, prior to licensure of the escrow agent by the commissioner.(b) A shareholder, officer, director, trustee, manager, or employee of an escrow agent, directly or indirectly compensated by an escrow agent within this state, is required to complete and execute a Fidelity Corporation Certificate application, prepared and issued by Fidelity Corporation, as a condition of their employment or entitlement to compensation, before the person may continue the regular discharge of their duties, or have access to moneys or negotiable securities belonging to or in the possession of the escrow agent, or draw checks upon the escrow agent or the trust funds of the escrow agent.(c) Fidelity Corporation Certificates may also be known as Escrow Agent’s Fidelity Corporation Certificates or EAFC Certificates. The certificate at all times remains the property of Fidelity Corporation, and is not transferable by either a member or employee. The certificate is not a warranty or guarantee by Fidelity Corporation of the integrity, veracity, or competence of the person.(d) An application for a Fidelity Corporation Certificate shall be in writing and in the form prescribed by Fidelity Corporation. The application may include (1) a fee not to exceed fifty dollars ($50), (2) two passport-size photographs, and (3) a set of fingerprint images and related information using the process established by the Department of Justice for requesting state summary criminal history information, plus the fee charged by the Department of Justice for processing noncriminal applicant fingerprint images and related information, in a manner established by the Department of Justice pursuant to subdivision (l). The Department of Justice shall honor the Fidelity Corporation report request form and issue a report to Fidelity Corporation, notwithstanding any other provision of law or regulation to the contrary. Fidelity Corporation is also entitled to submit a set of fingerprint images and related information in the Department of Justice specified noncriminal applicant fingerprint format for the purpose of requesting and obtaining a report from the Department of Justice, for the officers and employees of Fidelity Corporation. A member shall cause the filing of applications for all existing employees as required by this section within 30 days of written notice by Fidelity Corporation to the member.(e) The application form shall include a provision for binding arbitration to allow for arbitration of any appeal or dispute as to a decision by Fidelity Corporation concerning the certificate, as follows:A DISPUTE AS TO WHETHER THE DENIAL OF THIS CERTIFICATE APPLICATION OR ANY SUBSEQUENT SUSPENSION OR REVOCATION OF THE CERTIFICATE IS UNNECESSARY OR UNAUTHORIZED OR WAS IMPROPERLY, NEGLIGENTLY, OR UNLAWFULLY RENDERED, MAY BE DETERMINED BY SUBMISSION TO ARBITRATION AS PROVIDED BY CALIFORNIA LAW, AND NOT BY A LAWSUIT OR RESORT TO COURT PROCESS EXCEPT AS CALIFORNIA LAW PROVIDES FOR JUDICIAL REVIEW OF ARBITRATION PROCEEDINGS OR EXCEPT AS PROVIDED BY SECTION 17331.3 OF THE FINANCIAL CODE.   THE APPLICANT MAY, SUBJECT TO AGREEMENT, SUBMIT ANY ISSUE ARISING FROM A DECISION BY FIDELITY CORPORATION TO DENY THIS CERTIFICATE APPLICATION OR TO SUSPEND OR REVOKE THE CERTIFICATE TO BE DECIDED BY BINDING NEUTRAL ARBITRATION.   UPON AN AGREEMENT TO SUBMIT TO BINDING NEUTRAL ARBITRATION, THE APPLICANT HAS NO RIGHT TO HAVE ANY DISPUTE CONCERNING THIS CERTIFICATE APPLICATION LITIGATED IN A COURT OR JURY TRIAL NOR ANY JUDICIAL RIGHTS TO DISCOVERY AND APPEAL, EXCEPT AS SPECIFICALLY PROVIDED IN THE ESCROW LAW.   ARBITRATION MAY BE COMPELLED AS PROVIDED BY LAW. (f) There is no liability on the part of and no cause of action of any nature may arise against Fidelity Corporation or its members, directors, officers, employees, or agents, the State of California, the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, or any officer, agent, or employee of the state or the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation for statements made by Fidelity Corporation in reports or recommendations made pursuant to this division, or for reports or recommendations made pursuant to this division to Fidelity Corporation by its members, directors, officers, employees, or agents, the State of California, the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, or any officer, agent, or employee of the state or the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, unless the information provided is false and the party making the statement or providing the false information does so with knowledge and malice. Reports or recommendations made pursuant to this section, or Section 17331.1, 17331.2, or 17331.3, are not public documents.(g) There is no liability on the part of and no cause of action of any nature may arise against Fidelity Corporation or its members, directors, officers, employees, or agents, the State of California, the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, or an officer, agent, or employee of the state or the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation for the release of any information furnished to Fidelity Corporation pursuant to this section unless the information released is false and the party, including Fidelity Corporation, its members, directors, officers, employees, or agents, the state, the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, or any officer, agent, or employee of the state or the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, who releases the false information does so with knowledge and malice.(h) There is no liability on the part of and no cause of action of any nature may arise against Fidelity Corporation or its directors, officers, employees, or agents, for any decision to deny an application for a certificate or to suspend or revoke the certificate of any person or for the timing of any decision or the timing of any notice to persons or members thereof, or for any failure to deny an application under subdivision (a) of Section 17331.2. This subdivision does not apply to acts performed in bad faith or with malice.(i) Fidelity Corporation, any member of Fidelity Corporation, an agent of Fidelity Corporation or of its members, or any person who uses any information obtained under this section for any purpose not authorized by this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.(j) Section 17331, 17331.1, or 17331.2 does not constitute a restriction or limitation upon the obligation of Fidelity Corporation to indemnify members against loss, as provided in Sections 17310 and 17314. The failure to obtain a certificate, the denial of an application for a certificate, or the suspension, cancellation, or revocation of a certificate does not limit the obligation of Fidelity Corporation to indemnify a member against loss.(k) Notwithstanding Section 11105 of the Penal Code, Fidelity Corporation is entitled to receive state summary criminal history information and subsequent arrest notification from the Department of Justice as a result of fingerprint images and related information submitted to the Department of Justice by the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 17209, Section 17212.1, and subdivision (d) of Section 17414.1, by or on behalf of escrow agents, shareholders, officers, directors, trustees, managers, or employees of an escrow agent, directly or indirectly compensated by an escrow agent. The Department of Justice and Fidelity Corporation shall enter into an agreement to implement this subdivision. The Department of Financial Protection and Innovation shall forward to Fidelity Corporation, weekly, a list of names of individual fingerprints submitted to the Department of Justice.(l) (1) The Department of Financial Protection and Innovation shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for licensed escrow agents pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.(2) The Department of Justice shall provide a state and federal response to the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state response to Fidelity Corporation pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.SEC. 12.SEC. 13. Section 725 of the Harbors and Navigation Code is amended to read:725. (a) A temporary license may be issued to a salesperson under the following conditions:(1) The license shall be issued for a period not to exceed 60 days and only one license shall be issued to each applicant.(2) An application shall be filed for a temporary license and for a permanent license and at the same time the applicant shall pay all the prescribed fees.(3) The application shall be in the form and upon the conditions required by the department as provided in this article with respect to a permanent salesperson’s license.(4) On or before the expiration date of the temporary license, the licensee shall take a written examination for a permanent license. If, without a valid excuse, the licensee fails to appear for the examination at the time prescribed, the examination fee shall be forfeited. In the event of failure to pass the required examination, the department shall notify the applicant, may suggest further study, and upon payment of fees, shall schedule a reexamination.(5) The applicant shall be at least 18 years of age.(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the director may, in their discretion, extend the term of a temporary license or issue a new temporary license to provide an applicant time to comply with Section 733.5.SEC. 13.SEC. 14. Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:1522. The Legislature recognizes the need to generate timely and accurate positive fingerprint identification of applicants as a condition of issuing licenses, permits, or certificates of approval for persons to operate or provide direct care services in a community care facility, foster family home, certified family home or resource family of a licensed foster family agency, or a tribally approved home. Therefore, the Legislature supports the use of the fingerprint live-scan technology, as identified in the long-range plan of the Department of Justice for fully automating the processing of fingerprints and other data by the year 1999, otherwise known as the California Crime Information Intelligence System (CAL-CII), to be used for applicant fingerprints. It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to require the fingerprints of those individuals whose contact with community care clients may pose a risk to the clients’ health and safety. An individual shall be required to obtain either a criminal record clearance or a criminal record exemption from the State Department of Social Services before their initial presence in a community care facility or certified family home.(a) (1) Before and, as applicable, subsequent to issuing a license or special permit to a person to operate or manage a community care facility, the State Department of Social Services shall secure from an appropriate law enforcement agency a criminal record to determine whether the applicant or any other person specified in subdivision (b) has been convicted of a crime other than an infraction or arrested for a crime specified in Section 290 of the Penal Code, or for violating Section 245, 273ab, or 273.5 of the Penal Code, subdivision (b) of Section 273a of the Penal Code, or, prior to January 1, 1994, paragraph (2) of Section 273a of the Penal Code, or for a crime for which the department is prohibited from granting a criminal record exemption pursuant to subdivision (g).(2) The criminal history information shall include the full criminal record, if any, of those persons, and subsequent arrest information pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code.(3) The following shall apply to the criminal record information:(A) If the State Department of Social Services finds that the applicant, or any other person specified in subdivision (b), has been convicted of a crime other than an infraction, the application shall be denied, unless the department grants an exemption pursuant to subdivision (g) of this section or Section 1522.7.(B) If the State Department of Social Services finds that the applicant, or any other person specified in subdivision (b), is awaiting trial for a crime other than an infraction the State Department of Social Services may cease processing the criminal record information until the conclusion of the trial.(C) If no criminal record information has been recorded, the Department of Justice shall provide the applicant and the State Department of Social Services with a statement of that fact.(D) If the State Department of Social Services finds, after licensure, that the licensee, or any other person specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), has been convicted of a crime other than an infraction, the license may be revoked, unless the department grants an exemption pursuant to subdivision (g).(E) An applicant and any other person specified in subdivision (b) shall submit fingerprint images and related information to the Department of Justice for the purpose of searching the criminal records of the Federal Bureau of Investigation, in addition to the criminal records search required by this subdivision. If, after licensure, or the issuance of a certificate of approval of a certified family home by a foster family agency, the department determines that the licensee or any other person specified in subdivision (b) has a criminal record, the department may revoke the license, or require a foster family agency to revoke the certificate of approval, pursuant to Section 1550. The department may also suspend the license or require a foster family agency to suspend the certificate of approval pending an administrative hearing pursuant to Section 1550.5.(F) The State Department of Social Services shall develop procedures to provide the individual’s state and federal criminal history information with the written notification of the individual’s exemption denial or revocation based on the criminal record. Receipt of the criminal history information shall be optional on the part of the individual, as set forth in the agency’s procedures. The procedure shall protect the confidentiality and privacy of the individual’s record, and the criminal history information shall not be made available to the employer.(G) Notwithstanding any other law, the department may provide an individual with a copy of the individual’s state or federal level criminal offender record information search response as provided to that department by the Department of Justice if the department has denied a criminal background clearance based on this information and the individual makes a written request to the department for a copy specifying an address to which it is to be sent. The state or federal level criminal offender record information search response shall not be modified or altered from its form or content as provided by the Department of Justice and shall be provided to the address specified by the individual in the individual’s written request. The department shall retain a copy of the individual’s written request and the response and date provided.(b) (1) In addition to the applicant, this section is applicable to criminal record clearances and exemptions for the following persons:(A) An administrator, supervisor, manager, or director of the facility, or an individual acting in these roles, and an adult responsible for administration, operation of the facility, or direct supervision of staff.(B) Any adult, other than a client, residing in the facility, certified family home, resource family home, or tribally approved home.(C) Any person who provides client assistance in dressing, grooming, bathing, or personal hygiene. Any nurse assistant or home health aide meeting the requirements of Section 1338.5 or 1736.6, respectively, who is not employed, retained, or contracted by the licensee, and who has been certified or recertified on or after July 1, 1998, shall be deemed to meet the criminal record clearance requirements of this section. A certified nurse assistant and certified home health aide who will be providing client assistance and who falls under this exemption shall provide one copy of their current certification, prior to providing care, to the community care facility. The facility shall maintain the copy of the certification on file as long as care is being provided by the certified nurse assistant or certified home health aide at the facility or in a certified family home or resource family home of a foster family agency. This paragraph does not restrict the right of the department to exclude a certified nurse assistant or certified home health aide from a licensed community care facility or certified family home or resource family home of a foster family agency pursuant to Section 1558.(D) An adult or minor who is a staff person, volunteer, or employee who has contact with the clients.(E) Any adult who works in a community care facility that is eligible to accept placement of a dependent child.(F) If the applicant is a firm, partnership, association, limited liability company, or corporation, the chief executive officer and members of the board of directors, or governing body, and an individual responsible or accountable for the operation of the facility.(G) Officers of the governing body of the applicant, a person with a 10-percent or greater financial interest, and a person who exercises substantial influence over the operation of the facility.(2) The following persons are exempt from the requirements applicable under paragraph (1):(A) A medical professional, as defined in department regulations, who holds a valid license or certification from the person’s governing California medical care regulatory entity and who is not employed, retained, or contracted by the licensee if all of the following apply:(i) The criminal record of the person has been cleared as a condition of licensure or certification by the person’s governing California medical care regulatory entity.(ii) The person is providing time-limited specialized clinical care or services.(iii) The person is providing care or services within the person’s scope of practice.(iv) The person is not a community care facility licensee or an employee of the facility.(B) A third-party repair person or similar retained contractor or vendor if all of the following apply:(i) The person is hired for a defined, time-limited job.(ii) The person is not left alone with clients.(iii) When clients are present in the room in which the repair person or contractor is working, a staff person who has a criminal record clearance or exemption is also present.(C) Employees of a licensed home health agency and other members of licensed hospice interdisciplinary teams who have a contract with a client or resident of the facility, certified family home, or resource family home and are in the facility, certified family home, or resource family home at the request of that client or resident’s legal decisionmaker. The exemption does not apply to a person who is a community care facility licensee or an employee of the facility.(D) Clergy and other spiritual caregivers who are performing services in common areas of the community care facility, certified family home, resource family home, or tribally approved home or who are advising an individual client at the request of, or with the permission of, the client or legal decisionmaker, are exempt from fingerprint and criminal background check requirements imposed by community care licensing. This exemption does not apply to a person who is a community care licensee or employee of the facility.(E) Members of a fraternal, community, or service organization who conducts group activities for clients if all of the following apply:(i) Members are not left alone with clients.(ii) Members do not transport clients off the facility, certified family home, or resource family home premises.(iii) The same organization does not conduct group activities for clients more often than defined by the department’s regulations.(3) In addition to the exemptions in paragraph (2), the following persons in foster family homes, resource family homes, certified family homes, tribally approved homes, and small family homes are exempt from the requirements applicable under paragraph (1):(A) Adult friends and family of the foster parent, who come into the home to visit for a length of time no longer than defined by the department in regulations, provided that the adult friends and family of the foster parent are not left alone with the foster children. However, the foster parent, acting as a reasonable and prudent parent, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 362.04 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, may allow their adult friends and family to provide short-term care to the foster child and act as an appropriate occasional short-term babysitter for the child.(B) Parents of a foster child’s friend when the foster child is visiting the friend’s home and the friend, foster parent, or both are also present. However, the foster parent, acting as a reasonable and prudent parent, may allow the parent of the foster child’s friend to act as an appropriate, occasional short-term babysitter for the child without the friend being present.(C) Individuals who are engaged by a foster parent to provide short-term care to the child for periods not to exceed 24 hours. Caregivers shall use a reasonable and prudent parent standard in selecting appropriate individuals to act as appropriate occasional short-term babysitters.(4) In addition to the exemptions specified in paragraph (2), the following persons in adult day care and adult day support centers are exempt from the requirements applicable under paragraph (1):(A) Unless contraindicated by the client’s individualized program plan (IPP) or needs and service plan, a spouse, significant other, relative, or close friend of a client, or an attendant or a facilitator for a client with a developmental disability if the attendant or facilitator is not employed, retained, or contracted by the licensee. This exemption applies only if the person is visiting the client or providing direct care and supervision to the client.(B) A volunteer if all of the following apply:(i) The volunteer is supervised by the licensee or a facility employee with a criminal record clearance or exemption.(ii) The volunteer is never left alone with clients.(iii) The volunteer does not provide client assistance with dressing, grooming, bathing, or personal hygiene other than washing of hands.(5) (A) In addition to the exemptions specified in paragraph (2), the following persons in adult residential and social rehabilitation facilities, unless contraindicated by the client’s individualized program plan (IPP) or needs and services plan, are exempt from the requirements applicable under paragraph (1): a spouse, significant other, relative, or close friend of a client, or an attendant or a facilitator for a client with a developmental disability if the attendant or facilitator is not employed, retained, or contracted by the licensee. This exemption applies only if the person is visiting the client or providing direct care and supervision to that client.(B) This subdivision does not prevent a licensee from requiring a criminal record clearance of any individual exempt from the requirements of this section, provided that the individual has client contact.(6) A person similar to those described in paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive, as defined by the department in regulation, is exempt from the requirements applicable under paragraph (1).(c) (1) Subsequent to initial licensure, a person specified in subdivision (b) who is not exempted from fingerprinting shall obtain either a criminal record clearance or an exemption from disqualification pursuant to subdivision (g) of this section or Section 1522.7 from the State Department of Social Services prior to employment, residence, or initial presence in the facility. A person specified in subdivision (b) who is not exempt from fingerprinting shall be fingerprinted. The licensee shall submit fingerprint images and related information to the Department of Justice and the Federal Bureau of Investigation, through the Department of Justice, for a state and federal level criminal offender record information search, or comply with paragraph (1) of subdivision (h). These fingerprint images and related information shall be sent by electronic transmission in a manner approved by the State Department of Social Services and the Department of Justice for the purpose of obtaining a permanent set of fingerprints, and shall be submitted to the Department of Justice by the licensee. A licensee’s failure to prohibit the employment, residence, or initial presence of a person specified in subdivision (b) who is not exempt from fingerprinting and who has not received either a criminal record clearance or an exemption from disqualification pursuant to subdivision (g) or to comply with paragraph (1) of subdivision (h), as required in this section, shall result in the citation of a deficiency and the immediate assessment of civil penalties in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per violation per day for a maximum of five days, unless the violation is a second or subsequent violation within a 12-month period in which case the civil penalties shall be in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per violation for a maximum of 30 days, and shall be grounds for disciplining the licensee pursuant to Section 1550. The department may assess civil penalties for continued violations as permitted by Section 1548. The fingerprint images and related information shall then be submitted to the Department of Justice for processing. Upon request of the licensee, who shall enclose a self-addressed stamped postcard for this purpose, the Department of Justice shall verify receipt of the fingerprints. The department shall not require the person to disclose their criminal history information prior to receipt of the live scan results.(2) Within 14 calendar days of the receipt of the fingerprint images, the Department of Justice shall notify the State Department of Social Services of the criminal record information, as provided in subdivision (a). If no criminal record information has been recorded, the Department of Justice shall provide the licensee and the State Department of Social Services with a statement of that fact within 14 calendar days of receipt of the fingerprint images. Documentation of the individual’s clearance or exemption from disqualification shall be maintained by the licensee and be available for inspection. If new fingerprint images are required for processing, the Department of Justice shall, within 14 calendar days from the date of receipt of the fingerprints, notify the licensee that the fingerprints were illegible, the Department of Justice shall notify the State Department of Social Services, as required by Section 1522.04, and shall also notify the licensee by mail, within 14 days of electronic transmission of the fingerprints to the Department of Justice, if the person has no criminal history recorded. A violation of the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 1522.04 shall result in the citation of a deficiency and an immediate assessment of civil penalties in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per violation per day for a maximum of five days, unless the violation is a second or subsequent violation within a 12-month period in which case the civil penalties shall be in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per violation for a maximum of 30 days, and shall be grounds for disciplining the licensee pursuant to Section 1550. The department may assess civil penalties for continued violations as permitted by Section 1548.(3) Except for persons specified in subdivision (b) who are exempt from fingerprinting, the licensee shall endeavor to ascertain the previous employment history of persons required to be fingerprinted. If it is determined by the State Department of Social Services, on the basis of the fingerprint images and related information submitted to the Department of Justice, that subsequent to obtaining a criminal record clearance or exemption from disqualification pursuant to subdivision (g), the person has been convicted of, or is awaiting trial for, a sex offense against a minor, or has been convicted for an offense specified in Section 243.4, 273a, 273ab, 273d, 273g, or 368 of the Penal Code, or a felony, the State Department of Social Services shall notify the licensee to act immediately to terminate the person’s employment, remove the person from the community care facility, or bar the person from entering the community care facility. The State Department of Social Services may subsequently grant an exemption from disqualification pursuant to subdivision (g). If the conviction or arrest was for another crime, except an infraction, the licensee shall, upon notification by the State Department of Social Services, act immediately to either (A) terminate the person’s employment, remove the person from the community care facility, or bar the person from entering the community care facility; or (B) seek an exemption from disqualification pursuant to subdivision (g). The State Department of Social Services shall determine if the person shall be allowed to remain in the facility until a decision on the exemption from disqualification is rendered. A licensee’s failure to comply with the department’s prohibition of employment, contact with clients, or presence in the facility as required by this paragraph shall result in a citation of deficiency and an immediate assessment of civil penalties in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per violation per day and shall be grounds for disciplining the licensee pursuant to Section 1550.(4) The department may issue an exemption from disqualification on its own motion pursuant to subdivision (g) if the person’s criminal history indicates that the person is of good character based on the age, seriousness, and frequency of the conviction or convictions. The department, in consultation with interested parties, shall develop regulations to establish the criteria to grant an exemption from disqualification pursuant to this paragraph.(5) Concurrently with notifying the licensee pursuant to paragraph (3), the department shall notify the affected individual of their right to seek an exemption from disqualification pursuant to subdivision (g). The individual may seek an exemption from disqualification only if the licensee terminates the person’s employment or removes the person from the facility after receiving notice from the department pursuant to paragraph (3).(d) (1) Before and, as applicable, subsequent to issuing a license or certificate of approval to a person or persons to operate a foster family home, certified family home as described in Section 1506, or resource family pursuant to Section 1517 of this code or Section 16519.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the State Department of Social Services or other approving authority shall secure California and Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history information to determine whether the applicant or any person specified in subdivision (b) who is not exempt from fingerprinting has ever been convicted of a crime other than an infraction or arrested for a crime specified in subdivision (c) of Section 290 of the Penal Code, for violating Section 245, 273ab, or 273.5, subdivision (b) of Section 273a, or, prior to January 1, 1994, paragraph (2) of Section 273a, of the Penal Code, or for a crime for which the department is prohibited from granting a criminal record exemption pursuant to subdivision (g). The State Department of Social Services or other approving authority shall not issue a license or certificate of approval to a foster family home, certified family home, or resource family applicant who has not obtained both a California and Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal record clearance or exemption from disqualification pursuant to subdivision (g).(2) The criminal history information shall include the full criminal record, if any, of those persons.(3) Neither the Department of Justice nor the State Department of Social Services may charge a fee for the fingerprinting of an applicant for a license, special permit, or certificate of approval described in this subdivision. The record, if any, shall be taken into consideration when evaluating a prospective applicant.(4) The following shall apply to the criminal record information:(A) If the applicant or other persons specified in subdivision (b) who are not exempt from fingerprinting have convictions that would make the applicant’s home unfit as a foster family home, a certified family home, or resource family, the license, special permit, certificate of approval, or presence shall be denied.(B) If the State Department of Social Services finds that the applicant, or any person specified in subdivision (b) who is not exempt from fingerprinting, is awaiting trial for a crime other than an infraction, the State Department of Social Services or other approving authority may cease processing the criminal record information until the conclusion of the trial.(C) For purposes of this subdivision, a criminal record clearance provided under Section 8712 of the Family Code may be used by the department or other approving authority.(D) To the same extent required for federal funding, a person specified in subdivision (b) who is not exempt from fingerprinting shall submit a set of fingerprint images and related information to the Department of Justice and the Federal Bureau of Investigation, through the Department of Justice, for a state and federal level criminal offender record information search, in addition to the criminal records search required by subdivision (a).(5) Any person specified in this subdivision shall, as a part of the application, be fingerprinted and sign a declaration under penalty of perjury regarding any prior criminal convictions or arrests for any crime against a child, spousal or cohabitant abuse, or a crime for which the department cannot grant an exemption if the person was convicted and shall submit these fingerprints to the licensing agency or other approving authority.(6) (A) Subsequent to initial licensure, certification, or approval, a person specified in subdivision (b) who is not exempt from fingerprinting shall obtain both a California and Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal record clearance, or an exemption from disqualification pursuant to subdivision (g), prior to employment, residence, or initial presence in the foster family home, certified family home, or resource family home. A foster family home licensee or foster family agency shall submit fingerprint images and related information of persons specified in subdivision (b) who are not exempt from fingerprinting to the Department of Justice and the Federal Bureau of Investigation, through the Department of Justice, for a state and federal level criminal offender record information search, or to comply with paragraph (1) of subdivision (h). A foster family home licensee’s or a foster family agency’s failure to either prohibit the employment, residence, or initial presence of a person specified in subdivision (b) who is not exempt from fingerprinting and who has not received either a criminal record clearance or an exemption from disqualification pursuant to subdivision (g), or comply with paragraph (1) of subdivision (h), as required in this section, shall result in a citation of a deficiency, and the immediate civil penalties of one hundred dollars ($100) per violation per day for a maximum of five days, unless the violation is a second or subsequent violation within a 12-month period in which case the civil penalties shall be in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per violation for a maximum of 30 days, and shall be grounds for disciplining the licensee pursuant to Section 1550. A violation of the regulation adopted pursuant to Section 1522.04 shall result in the citation of a deficiency and an immediate assessment of civil penalties in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per violation per day for a maximum of five days, unless the violation is a second or subsequent violation within a 12-month period in which case the civil penalties shall be in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per violation for a maximum of 30 days, and shall be grounds for disciplining the foster family home licensee or the foster family agency pursuant to Section 1550. The State Department of Social Services may assess penalties for continued violations, as permitted by Section 1548. The fingerprint images shall then be submitted to the Department of Justice for processing.(B) Upon request of the licensee, who shall enclose a self-addressed envelope for this purpose, the Department of Justice shall verify receipt of the fingerprints. Within five working days of the receipt of the criminal record or information regarding criminal convictions from the Department of Justice, the department shall notify the applicant of any criminal arrests or convictions. If no arrests or convictions are recorded, the Department of Justice shall provide the foster family home licensee or the foster family agency with a statement of that fact concurrent with providing the information to the State Department of Social Services.(7) If the State Department of Social Services or other approving authority finds that the applicant, or any other person specified in subdivision (b) who is not exempt from fingerprinting, has been convicted of a crime other than an infraction, the application or presence shall be denied, unless the department grants an exemption from disqualification pursuant to subdivision (g).(8) If the State Department of Social Services or other approving authority finds, after licensure or the granting of the certificate of approval, that the licensee, certified foster parent, resource family, or any other person specified in subdivision (b) who is not exempt from fingerprinting, has been convicted of a crime other than an infraction, the license or certificate of approval may be revoked or rescinded by the department or the foster family agency, whichever is applicable, unless the department grants an exemption from disqualification pursuant to subdivision (g). A licensee’s failure to comply with the department’s prohibition of employment, contact with clients, or presence in the facility as required by paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) shall be grounds for disciplining the licensee pursuant to Section 1550.(e) (1) The State Department of Social Services shall not use a record of arrest to deny, revoke, rescind, or terminate an application, license, certificate of approval, employment, or residence unless the department investigates the incident and secures evidence, whether or not related to the incident of arrest, that is admissible in an administrative hearing to establish conduct by the person that may pose a risk to the health and safety of a person who is or may become a client.(2) The department shall not issue a criminal record clearance to a person who has been arrested for a crime specified in Section 290 of the Penal Code, or for violating Section 245, 273ab, or 273.5, or subdivision (b) of Section 273a, of the Penal Code, or, prior to January 1, 1994, paragraph (2) of Section 273a of the Penal Code, or for a crime for which the department is prohibited from granting a criminal record exemption pursuant to subdivision (g), prior to the completion of an investigation pursuant to paragraph (1).(3) The State Department of Social Services is authorized to obtain arrest or conviction records or reports from any law enforcement agency as necessary to the performance of its duties to inspect, license, and investigate community care facilities and individuals associated with a community care facility.(f) (1) For purposes of this chapter, a conviction means a plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere. Any action that the State Department of Social Services is permitted to take following the establishment of a conviction may be taken when the time for appeal has elapsed, when the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, notwithstanding a subsequent order pursuant to Sections 1203.4 and 1203.4a of the Penal Code permitting the person to withdraw a plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment. For purposes of this chapter, the record of a conviction, or a copy thereof certified by the clerk of the court or by a judge of the court in which the conviction occurred, shall be conclusive evidence of the conviction. For purposes of this chapter, the arrest disposition report certified by the Department of Justice, or documents admissible in a criminal action pursuant to Section 969b of the Penal Code, shall be prima facie evidence of the conviction, notwithstanding any other law prohibiting the admission of these documents in a civil or administrative action.(2) For purposes of this chapter, the department shall consider criminal convictions from another state or federal court as if the criminal offense was committed in this state.(g) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision with respect to a foster care provider applicant, including a relative caregiver, nonrelative extended family member, or resource family, after review of the record, the department may grant an exemption from disqualification for a license or special permit as specified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a), or for a license, special permit, or certificate of approval as specified in paragraphs (4), (7), and (8) of subdivision (d), or for employment, residence, or presence in a community care facility as specified in paragraphs (3), (4), and (5) of subdivision (c), if the department has substantial and convincing evidence to support a reasonable belief that the applicant or the person convicted of the crime, if other than the applicant, is rehabilitated and is presently of such good character as to justify issuance of the license or special permit or granting an exemption for purposes of subdivision (c). Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, an exemption shall not be granted pursuant to this subdivision if the conviction was for any of the following offenses:(A) (i) An offense specified in Section 220, 243.4, or 264.1, subdivision (a) of Section 273a, or, prior to January 1, 1994, paragraph (1) of Section 273a, Section 273ab, 273d, 288, or 289, subdivision (c) of Section 290, or Section 368, of the Penal Code, or was a conviction of another crime against an individual specified in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code.(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), the department may grant an exemption regarding the conviction for an offense described in paragraph (1), (2), (7), or (8) of subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code, if the employee or prospective employee has been rehabilitated as provided in Section 4852.03 of the Penal Code, has maintained the conduct required in Section 4852.05 of the Penal Code for at least 10 years, and has the recommendation of the district attorney representing the employee’s county of residence, or if the employee or prospective employee has received a certificate of rehabilitation pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 4852.01) of Title 6 of Part 3 of the Penal Code.(B) A felony offense specified in Section 729 of the Business and Professions Code or Section 206 or 215, subdivision (a) of Section 347, subdivision (b) of Section 417, or subdivision (a) of Section 451 of the Penal Code.(C) (i) Notwithstanding clause (ii) of subparagraph (A), an exemption shall not be granted pursuant to this subdivision to any applicant for licensure of a community care facility eligible to accept placement of a dependent child if either that applicant or any other person specified in subdivision (b) who is associated with the facility has a felony conviction for either of the following offenses:(I) A felony conviction for child abuse or neglect, spousal abuse, crimes against a child, including child pornography, or for a crime involving violence, including rape, sexual assault, or homicide, but not including other physical assault and battery. For purposes of this subclause, a crime involving violence means a violent crime specified in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) or subparagraph (B).(II) A felony conviction for physical assault, battery, or a drug- or alcohol-related offense that occurred within the last five years.(ii) This subparagraph shall be operative to the extent that compliance with these provisions is required by federal law as a condition for receiving funding under Title IV-E of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 670 et seq.).(2) (A) For a foster care provider applicant, a resource family applicant, a tribally approved home applicant, or a prospective respite care provider, as described in Section 16501.01 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, except as specified in clause (iv), an exemption shall not be granted if that applicant, or any individual subject to the background check requirements of this section pursuant to foster care provider applicant, resource family approval, tribally approved home, or respite care provider standards, has a conviction within the past 10 years for any of the following offenses:(i) An offense specified in Section 220, 243.4, or 264.1, subdivision (a) of Section 273a, or, prior to January 1, 1994, paragraph (1) of Section 273a, Section 273ab, 273d, 288, or 289, subdivision (c) of Section 290, or Section 368, of the Penal Code, or was a conviction of another crime against an individual specified in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code.(ii) A felony offense specified in Section 729 of the Business and Professions Code or Section 206 or 215, subdivision (a) of Section 347, subdivision (b) of Section 417, or subdivision (a) of Section 451 of the Penal Code.(iii) Except as specified in clause (iv), an exemption shall not be granted pursuant to this subdivision to any foster care provider applicant, including a tribally approved home applicant, if that applicant, or any other person specified in subdivision (b) in those homes, has a felony conviction for either of the following offenses:(I) A felony conviction for child abuse or neglect, spousal abuse, crimes against a child, including child pornography, or for a crime involving violence, including rape, sexual assault, or homicide, but not including other physical assault and battery. For purposes of this subparagraph, a crime involving violence means a violent crime specified in clause (i) of subparagraph (A), or clause (ii) of this subparagraph.(II) A felony conviction, within the last five years, for physical assault, battery, or a drug- or alcohol-related offense.(III) This clause does not apply to licenses or approvals when a caregiver was granted an exemption to a criminal conviction described in clause (i) prior to the enactment of this clause.(IV) This clause shall remain operative only to the extent that compliance with its provisions is required by federal law as a condition for receiving funding under Title IV-E of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 670 et seq.).(iv) For the sole purpose of approving a home pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 16519.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the department or other approving entity may grant an exemption for a relative or any other adult living in the home, who has been convicted of an offense described in this subparagraph if the applicant is seeking placement of a specific child or children with whom the applicant is related, the applicant or other adult living in the home is of present good character necessary to justify granting the exemption pursuant to the factors described in subparagraph (C), and the applicant or other adult living in the home does not have a felony conviction within the last five years for child abuse or neglect, spousal abuse, rape, sexual assault, homicide, or any other crime against a child, including child pornography. An exemption granted pursuant to this clause shall only be valid for purposes of the relative’s child-specific resource family approval and shall not be transferrable to any other setting pursuant to subdivision (h).(B) The department or other approving entity may grant an exemption from disqualification to a foster care provider, resource family applicant, tribally approved home applicant, or any individual subject to the background check requirements of this section pursuant to foster care provider applicant, resource family approval, tribally approved home, or respite care provider standards, if the department or other approving entity has substantial and convincing evidence to support a reasonable belief that the applicant or the person convicted of the crime, if other than the applicant, is of present good character necessary to justify the granting of an exemption and the conviction is for one of the following offenses:(i) (I) Any misdemeanor conviction within the last three years that is not otherwise prohibited by subparagraph (A).(II) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a misdemeanor conviction for statutory rape, as defined in Section 261.5 of the Penal Code, a misdemeanor conviction for indecent exposure, as defined in Section 314 of the Penal Code, or a misdemeanor conviction for financial abuse against an elder, as defined in Section 368 of the Penal Code, shall be eligible for the consideration of an exemption as set forth in subparagraph (C).(ii) Any felony conviction within the last five years that is not otherwise prohibited by subparagraph (A).(C) When granting an exemption for a crime listed in subparagraph (B), the department or other approving entity shall consider all reasonably available information, including, but not limited to, the following:(i) The nature of the crime or crimes.(ii) The period of time since the crime was committed.(iii) Any longstanding pattern of criminal conduct.(iv) Circumstances surrounding the commission of the crime indicating the likelihood of future criminal activity.(v) Activities since conviction, including employment, participation in therapy, education, or treatment.(vi) Whether the person convicted has successfully completed probation or parole, obtained a certificate of rehabilitation, or been granted a pardon by the Governor.(vii) Any character references or other evidence submitted by the applicant.(viii) Whether the person convicted demonstrated honesty and truthfulness concerning the crime or crimes during the application and approval process.(D) (i) The department or other approving entity shall grant an exemption from disqualification to a foster care provider applicant, resource family applicant, tribally approved home applicant, or any person subject to the background check requirements of this section pursuant to foster care provider applicant, resource family approval, tribally approved home, or respite care provider standards, who has been convicted of an offense not listed in subparagraph (A) or (B), if the individual’s state and federal criminal history information received from the Department of Justice independently supports a reasonable belief that the applicant or the person convicted of the crime, if other than the applicant, is of present good character necessary to justify the granting of an exemption.(ii) Notwithstanding the fact that an individual meets the criteria described in clause (i), the department or other approving entity, at its discretion, as necessary to protect the health and safety of a child, may evaluate a person described in clause (i), for purposes of making an exemption decision, pursuant to the criteria described in subparagraphs (B) and (C).(E) This paragraph does not apply to licenses or approvals for which a caregiver was granted an exemption for a criminal conviction prior to January 1, 2018.(3) The department shall not prohibit a person from being employed or having contact with clients in a facility, certified family home, or resource family home on the basis of a denied criminal record exemption request or arrest information unless the department complies with the requirements of Section 1558 of this code or Section 16519.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, as applicable.(h) (1) For purposes of compliance with this section, the department may permit an individual to transfer a current criminal record clearance, as defined in subdivision (a), from one facility to another, as long as the criminal record clearance has been processed through a state licensing district office, and is being transferred to another facility licensed by a state licensing district office. The request shall be submitted to the department on a form provided by the department or submitted via the department’s secure online portal. Upon request of the licensee, who shall verify the individual’s identity, the State Department of Social Services shall verify whether the individual has a clearance that can be transferred.(2) The State Department of Social Services shall hold criminal record clearances in its active files for a minimum of three years after an employee is no longer employed at a licensed facility in order for the criminal record clearance to be transferred.(3) A criminal record clearance or exemption processed by the department, a county office with clearance and exemption authority pursuant to Section 16519.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or a county office with department-delegated licensing authority shall be accepted by the department or county upon notification of transfer.(4) With respect to notifications issued by the Department of Justice pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code and Section 1522.1 concerning an individual whose criminal record clearance was originally processed by the department, a county office with clearance and exemption authority pursuant to Section 16519.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or a county office with department-delegated licensing authority, all of the following shall apply:(A) The Department of Justice shall process a request from the department or a county to receive the notice only if all of the following conditions are met:(i) The request shall be submitted to the Department of Justice by the agency to be substituted to receive the notification.(ii)  The request shall be for the same applicant type as the type for which the original clearance was obtained.(iii) The request shall contain all prescribed data elements and format protocols pursuant to a written agreement between the department and the Department of Justice.(B) (i) On or before January 7, 2005, the department shall notify the Department of Justice of all county offices that have department-delegated licensing authority.(ii) The department shall notify the Department of Justice within 15 calendar days of the date on which a new county office receives department-delegated licensing authority or a county’s delegated licensing authority is rescinded.(C) The Department of Justice shall charge the department, a county office with department-delegated licensing authority, or a county child welfare agency with criminal record clearance and exemption authority, a fee for each time a request to substitute the recipient agency is received for purposes of this paragraph. This fee shall not exceed the cost of providing the service.(i) The full criminal record obtained for purposes of this section may be used by the department or by a licensed adoption agency as a clearance required for adoption purposes.(j) If a licensee or facility is required by law to deny employment or to terminate employment of any employee based on written notification from the department that the employee has a prior criminal conviction or is determined unsuitable for employment under Section 1558, the licensee or facility shall not incur civil liability or unemployment insurance liability as a result of that denial or termination.(k) The State Department of Social Services may charge a fee for the costs of processing electronic fingerprint images and related information.SEC. 14.SEC. 15. Section 1568.09 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:1568.09. It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to require the electronic fingerprint images of those individuals whose contact with residents of residential care facilities for persons with a chronic, life-threatening illness may pose a risk to the residents’ health and safety.It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this section, to require the electronic fingerprint images of those individuals whose contact with community care clients may pose a risk to the clients’ health and safety. An individual shall be required to obtain either a criminal record clearance or a criminal record exemption from the State Department of Social Services before the individual’s initial presence in a residential care facility for persons with a chronic, life-threatening illness.(a) (1) Before and, as applicable, subsequent to issuing a license to a person or persons to operate or manage a residential care facility, the department shall secure from an appropriate law enforcement agency a criminal record to determine whether the applicant or any other person specified in subdivision (b) has ever been convicted of a crime other than an infraction or arrested for any crime specified in subdivision (c) of Section 290 of the Penal Code, or for violating Section 245, 273ab, or 273.5, subdivision (b) of Section 273a, or, prior to January 1, 1994, paragraph (2) of Section 273a, of the Penal Code, or for any crime for which the department is prohibited from granting a criminal record exemption pursuant to subdivision (f).(2) The criminal history information shall include the full criminal record, if any, of those persons, and subsequent arrest information pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code.(3) The following shall apply to the criminal record information:(A) If the State Department of Social Services finds that the applicant or another person specified in subdivision (b), has been convicted of a crime, other than an infraction, the application shall be denied, unless the director grants an exemption pursuant to subdivision (f) of this section or Section 1522.7.(B) If the State Department of Social Services finds that the applicant, or another person specified in subdivision (b), is awaiting trial for a crime other than an infraction, the State Department of Social Services may cease processing the criminal record information until the conclusion of the trial.(C) If no criminal record information has been recorded, the Department of Justice shall provide the applicant and the State Department of Social Services with a statement of that fact.(D) If the State Department of Social Services finds after licensure that the licensee, or any other person specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), has been convicted of a crime other than an infraction, the license may be revoked, unless the director grants an exemption pursuant to subdivision (f).(E) An applicant and any other person specified in subdivision (b) shall submit fingerprint images and related information to the Department of Justice and the Federal Bureau of Investigation, through the Department of Justice, for a state and federal level criminal offender record information search, in addition to the search required by this subdivision. If, after licensure, the department determines that the licensee or person specified in subdivision (b) has a criminal record, the license may be revoked pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1568.082. The department may also suspend the license pending an administrative hearing pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1568.082.(b) In addition to the applicant, this section shall be applicable to criminal record clearances and exemptions for the following persons:(1) An administrator, supervisor, manager, or director of the facility, or an individual acting in these roles, and an adult responsible for administration, operation of the facility, or direct supervision of staff of the facility.(2) A person, other than a resident, residing in the facility.(3) A person who provides resident assistance in dressing, grooming, bathing, or personal hygiene. A nurse assistant or home health aide meeting the requirements of Section 1338.5 or 1736.6, respectively, who is not employed, retained, or contracted by the licensee, and who has been certified or recertified on or after July 1, 1998, shall be deemed to meet the criminal record clearance requirements of this section. A certified nurse assistant and certified home health aide who will be providing client assistance and who falls under this exemption shall provide one copy of their current certification, prior to providing care, to the residential care facility for persons with a chronic, life-threatening illness. The facility shall maintain the copy of the certification on file as long as care is being provided by the certified nurse assistant or certified home health aide at the facility. This paragraph does not restrict the right of the department to exclude a certified nurse assistant or certified home health aide from a licensed residential care facility for persons with a chronic, life-threatening illness pursuant to Section 1568.092.(4) (A) An adult or minor who is staff person, volunteer, or employee who has contact with the residents.(B) A volunteer shall be exempt from the requirements of this subdivision if the volunteer is a relative, significant other, or close friend of a client receiving care in the facility and the volunteer does not provide direct care and supervision of residents. A volunteer who provides direct care and supervision shall be exempt if the volunteer is a resident’s spouse, significant other, close friend, or family member and provides direct care and supervision to that resident only at the request of the resident. The department may define in regulations persons similar to those described in this subparagraph who may be exempt from the requirements of this subdivision.(5) If the applicant is a firm, partnership, association, limited liability company, or corporation, the chief executive officer and members of the board of directors, or the governing body, and an individual responsible or accountable for the operation of the facility.(6) Officers of the governing body of the applicant, a person with a 10-percent or greater financial interest, and a person who exercises substantial influence over the operation of the facility.(c) (1) (A) Subsequent to initial licensure, a person specified in subdivision (b) and not exempted from fingerprinting shall obtain either a criminal record clearance or an exemption from disqualification, pursuant to subdivision (f) of this section or Section 1522.7, from the State Department of Social Services prior to employment, residence, or initial presence in the facility. A person specified in subdivision (b) who is not exempt from fingerprinting shall be fingerprinted. The licensee shall submit fingerprint images and related information to the Department of Justice and the Federal Bureau of Investigation, through the Department of Justice, for a state and federal level criminal offender record information search, or to comply with paragraph (1) of subdivision (g), prior to the person’s employment, residence, or initial presence in the residential care facility.(B) These fingerprint images and related information shall be electronically submitted to the Department of Justice in a manner approved by the State Department of Social Services and the Department of Justice, for the purpose of obtaining a permanent set of fingerprints. A licensee’s failure to submit fingerprint images and related information to the Department of Justice, or to comply with paragraph (1) of subdivision (g), as required in this section, shall result in the citation of a deficiency and an immediate assessment of civil penalties in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per violation per day for a maximum of five days, unless the violation is a second or subsequent violation within a 12-month period in which case the civil penalties shall be in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per violation for a maximum of 30 days, and shall be grounds for disciplining the licensee pursuant to Section 1568.082. The State Department of Social Services may assess civil penalties for continued violations as allowed in Section 1568.0822. The fingerprint images and related information shall then be submitted to the Department of Justice for processing. The licensee shall maintain and make available for inspection documentation of the individual’s clearance or exemption. The department shall not require the person to disclose their criminal history information prior to receipt of live scan results.(2) A violation of the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 1522.04 shall result in the citation of a deficiency and an immediate assessment of civil penalties in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per violation per day for a maximum of five days, unless the violation is a second or subsequent violation within a 12-month period in which case the civil penalties shall be in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per violation for a maximum of 30 days, and shall be grounds for disciplining the licensee pursuant to Section 1568.082. The department may assess civil penalties for continued violations as permitted by Section 1568.0822.(3) Within 14 calendar days of the receipt of the fingerprint images, the Department of Justice shall notify the State Department of Social Services of the criminal record information, as provided for in this subdivision. If no criminal record information has been recorded, the Department of Justice shall provide the licensee and the State Department of Social Services with a statement of that fact within 14 calendar days of receipt of the fingerprint images. If new fingerprint images are required for processing, the Department of Justice shall, within 14 calendar days from the date of receipt of the fingerprint images, notify the licensee that the fingerprint images were illegible. The Department of Justice shall notify the department, as required by Section 1522.04, and shall notify the licensee by mail within 14 days of electronic transmission of the fingerprint images to the Department of Justice, if the person has no criminal history record.(4) Except for persons specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the licensee shall endeavor to ascertain the previous employment history of persons required to be fingerprinted under this subdivision. If it is determined by the State Department of Social Services, on the basis of the fingerprint images submitted to the Department of Justice, that the person has been convicted of a sex offense against a minor, an offense specified in Section 243.4, 273a, 273ab, 273d, 273g, or 368 of the Penal Code, or a felony, the department shall notify the licensee to act immediately to terminate the person’s employment, remove the person from the residential care facility, or bar the person from entering the residential care facility. The department may subsequently grant an exemption pursuant to subdivision (f). If the conviction was for another crime, except an infraction, the licensee shall, upon notification by the department, act immediately to either (A) terminate the person’s employment, remove the person from the residential care facility, or bar the person from entering the residential care facility; or (B) seek an exemption pursuant to subdivision (f). The department shall determine if the person shall be allowed to remain in the facility until a decision on the exemption is rendered. A licensee’s failure to comply with the department’s prohibition of employment, contact with clients, or presence in the facility as required by this paragraph shall result in a citation of deficiency and an immediate assessment of civil penalties by the department against the licensee, in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per violation per day for a maximum of five days, unless the violation is a second or subsequent violation within a 12-month period in which case the civil penalties shall be in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per violation for a maximum of 30 days, and shall be grounds for disciplining the licensee pursuant to Section 1568.082.(5) The department may issue an exemption on its own motion pursuant to subdivision (f) if the person’s criminal history indicates that the person is of good character based on the age, seriousness, and frequency of the conviction or convictions. The department, in consultation with interested parties, shall develop regulations to establish the criteria to grant an exemption pursuant to this paragraph.(6) Concurrently with notifying the licensee pursuant to paragraph (4), the department shall notify the affected individual of the right to seek an exemption pursuant to subdivision (f). The individual may seek an exemption only if the licensee terminates the person’s employment or removes the person from the facility after receiving notice from the department pursuant to paragraph (4).(d) (1) For purposes of this section or any other provision of this chapter, a conviction means a plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere. An action that the department is permitted to take following the establishment of a conviction may be taken when the time for appeal has elapsed, when the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of the sentence, notwithstanding a subsequent order pursuant to Sections 1203.4 and 1203.4a of the Penal Code permitting that person to withdraw their plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment. For purposes of this chapter, the record of a conviction, or a copy thereof certified by the clerk of the court or by a judge of the court in which the conviction occurred, shall be conclusive evidence of the conviction. For purposes of this section or any other provision of this chapter, the arrest disposition report certified by the Department of Justice, or documents admissible in a criminal action pursuant to Section 969b of the Penal Code, shall be prima facie evidence of the conviction, notwithstanding any other provision of law prohibiting the admission of these documents in a civil or administrative action.(2) For purposes of this section or any other provision of this chapter, the department shall consider criminal convictions from another state or federal court as if the criminal offense was committed in this state.(e) (1) The State Department of Social Services shall not use a record of arrest to deny, revoke, or terminate any application, license, employment, or residence unless the department investigates the incident and secures evidence, whether or not related to the incident of arrest, that is admissible in an administrative hearing to establish conduct by the person that may pose a risk to the health and safety of any person who is or may become a client.(2) The department shall not issue a criminal record clearance to a person who has been arrested for any crime specified in Section 290 of the Penal Code, for violating Section 245, 273ab, or 273.5, or subdivision (b) of Section 273a, of the Penal Code, or, prior to January 1, 1994, paragraph (2) of Section 273a of the Penal Code, or for any crime for which the department is prohibited from granting a criminal record exemption pursuant to subdivision (f), prior to the department’s completion of an investigation pursuant to paragraph (1).(3) The State Department of Social Services is authorized to obtain arrest or conviction records or reports from a law enforcement agency as necessary to the performance of its duties to inspect, license, and investigate community care facilities and individuals associated with a community care facility.(f) (1) After review of the record, the director may grant an exemption from disqualification for a license as specified in paragraphs (1) and (4) of subdivision (a), or for employment, residence, or presence in a residential care facility as specified in paragraphs (4), (5), and (6) of subdivision (c) if the director has substantial and convincing evidence to support a reasonable belief that the applicant and the person convicted of the crime, if other than the applicant, are of such good character as to justify issuance of the license or special permit or granting an exemption for purposes of subdivision (c). However, an exemption shall not be granted pursuant to this subdivision if the conviction was for any of the following offenses:(A) An offense specified in Section 220, 243.4, or 264.1, subdivision (a) of Section 273a, or, prior to January 1, 1994, paragraph (1) of Section 273a, Section 273ab, 273d, 288, or 289, subdivision (c) of Section 290, or Section 368, of the Penal Code, or was a conviction of another crime against an individual specified in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code.(B) A felony offense specified in Section 729 of the Business and Professions Code or Section 206 or 215, subdivision (a) of Section 347, subdivision (b) of Section 417, or subdivision (a) of Section 451 of the Penal Code.(2) The department shall not prohibit a person from being employed or having contact with clients in a facility on the basis of a denied criminal record exemption request or arrest information unless the department complies with Section 1568.092.(g) (1) For purposes of compliance with this section, the department may permit an individual to transfer a current criminal record clearance, as defined in subdivision (a), from one facility to another, as long as the criminal record clearance has been processed through a state licensing district office, and is being transferred to another facility licensed by a state licensing district office. The request shall be submitted to the department on a form provided by the department or submitted via the department’s secure online portal. Upon request of the licensee, who shall verify the individual’s identity, the department shall verify whether the individual has a clearance that can be transferred.(2) The State Department of Social Services shall hold criminal record clearances in its active files for a minimum of two years after an employee is no longer employed at a licensed facility in order for the criminal record clearance to be transferred.(h) If a licensee or facility is required by law to deny employment or to terminate employment of any employee based on written notification from the state department that the employee has a prior criminal conviction or is determined unsuitable for employment under Section 1568.092, the licensee or facility shall not incur civil liability or unemployment insurance liability as a result of that denial or termination.(i) (1) The Department of Justice shall charge a fee sufficient to cover its cost in providing services to comply with the 14-day requirement contained in subdivision (c) for provision to the department of criminal record information.(2) Paragraph (1) shall cease to be implemented when the department adopts emergency regulations pursuant to Section 1522.04, and shall become inoperative when permanent regulations are adopted under that section.(j) Notwithstanding any other law, the department may provide an individual with a copy of their state or federal level criminal offender record information search response as provided to that department by the Department of Justice if the department has denied a criminal background clearance based on this information and the individual makes a written request to the department for a copy specifying an address to which it is to be sent. The state or federal level criminal offender record information search response shall not be modified or altered from its form or content as provided by the Department of Justice and shall be provided to the address specified by the individual in their written request. The department shall retain a copy of the individual’s written request and the response and date provided.SEC. 15.SEC. 16. Section 1569.17 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:1569.17. The Legislature recognizes the need to generate timely and accurate positive fingerprint identification of applicants as a condition of issuing licenses, permits, or certificates of approval for persons to operate or provide direct care services in a residential care facility for the elderly. It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to require the fingerprints of those individuals whose contact with clients of residential care facilities for the elderly may pose a risk to the clients’ health and safety. An individual shall be required to obtain either a criminal record clearance or a criminal record exemption from the State Department of Social Services before their initial presence in a residential care facility for the elderly.(a) (1) Before and, as applicable, subsequent to issuing a license to any person or persons to operate or manage a residential care facility for the elderly, the department shall secure from an appropriate law enforcement agency a criminal record to determine whether the applicant or any other person specified in subdivision (b) has ever been convicted of a crime other than an infraction or arrested for any crime specified in subdivision (c) of Section 290 of the Penal Code, or for violating Section 245, 273ab, or 273.5, subdivision (b) of Section 273a, or, prior to January 1, 1994, paragraph (2) of Section 273a, of the Penal Code, or for any crime for which the department is prohibited from granting a criminal record exemption pursuant to subdivision (f).(2) The criminal history information shall include the full criminal record, if any, of those persons, and subsequent arrest information pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code.(3) The following shall apply to the criminal record information:(A) If the State Department of Social Services finds that the applicant or any other person specified in subdivision (b) has been convicted of a crime, other than an infraction, the application or presence shall be denied, unless the director grants an exemption pursuant to subdivision (f) of this section or Section 1522.7.(B) If the State Department of Social Services finds that the applicant, or any other person specified in subdivision (b), is awaiting trial for a crime other than an infraction, the State Department of Social Services may cease processing the criminal record information until the conclusion of the trial.(C) If no criminal record information has been recorded, the Department of Justice shall provide the applicant and the State Department of Social Services with a statement of that fact.(D) If the State Department of Social Services finds after licensure that the licensee, or any other person specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), has been convicted of a crime other than an infraction, the license may be revoked, unless the director grants an exemption pursuant to subdivision (f).(E) An applicant and any other person specified in subdivision (b) shall submit fingerprint images and related information to the Department of Justice and the Federal Bureau of Investigation, through the Department of Justice, for a state and federal level criminal offender record information search, in addition to the search required by subdivision (a). If, after licensure, the department determines that the licensee or person specified in subdivision (b) has a criminal record, the license may be revoked pursuant to Section 1569.50. The department may also suspend the license pending an administrative hearing pursuant to Sections 1569.50 and 1569.51.(b) In addition to the applicant, the provisions of this section shall apply to criminal record clearances and exemptions for the following persons:(1) (A) An administrator, supervisor, manager, or director of the facility, or an individual acting in these roles, and an adult responsible for administration, operation of the facility, or direct supervision of staff.(B) Any person, other than a client, residing in the facility. Residents of unlicensed independent senior housing facilities that are located in contiguous buildings on the same property as a residential care facility for the elderly shall be exempt from these requirements.(C) Any person who provides client assistance in dressing, grooming, bathing, or personal hygiene. Any nurse assistant or home health aide meeting the requirements of Section 1338.5 or 1736.6, respectively, who is not employed, retained, or contracted by the licensee, and who has been certified or recertified on or after July 1, 1998, shall be deemed to meet the criminal record clearance requirements of this section. A certified nurse assistant and certified home health aide who will be providing client assistance and who falls under this exemption shall provide one copy of their current certification, prior to providing care, to the residential care facility for the elderly. The facility shall maintain the copy of the certification on file as long as the care is being provided by the certified nurse assistant or certified home health aide at the facility. Nothing in this paragraph restricts the right of the department to exclude a certified nurse assistant or certified home health aide from a licensed residential care facility for the elderly pursuant to Section 1569.58.(D) An adult or minor who is a staff person, volunteer, or employee who has contact with the clients.(E) If the applicant is a firm, partnership, association, limited liability company, or corporation, the chief executive officer and members of the board of directors, or the governing body, and an individual responsible or accountable for the operation of the facility.(F) Officers of the governing body of the applicant, a person with a 10-percent or greater financial interest, and a person who exercises substantial influence over the operation of the facility.(2) The following persons are exempt from requirements applicable under paragraph (1):(A) A spouse, relative, significant other, or close friend of a client shall be exempt if this person is visiting the client or provides direct care and supervision to that client only.(B) A volunteer to whom all of the following apply:(i) The volunteer is at the facility during normal waking hours.(ii) The volunteer is directly supervised by the licensee or a facility employee with a criminal record clearance or exemption.(iii) The volunteer spends no more than 16 hours per week at the facility.(iv) The volunteer does not provide clients with assistance in dressing, grooming, bathing, or personal hygiene.(v) The volunteer is not left alone with clients in care.(C) A third-party contractor or vendor retained by the facility if the contractor or vendor is not left alone with clients in care.(D) A third-party contractor or other business professional retained by a client and at the facility at the request or by permission of that client. These individuals shall not be left alone with other clients.(E) Licensed or certified medical professionals are exempt from fingerprint and criminal background check requirements imposed by community care licensing. This exemption does not apply to a person who is a community care facility licensee or an employee of the facility.(F) Employees of licensed home health agencies and members of licensed hospice interdisciplinary teams who have contact with a resident of a residential care facility at the request of the resident or resident’s legal decisionmaker are exempt from fingerprint and criminal background check requirements imposed by community care licensing. This exemption does not apply to a person who is a community care facility licensee or an employee of the facility.(G) Clergy and other spiritual caregivers who are performing services in common areas of the residential care facility, or who are advising an individual resident at the request of, or with permission of, the resident, are exempt from fingerprint and criminal background check requirements imposed by community care licensing. This exemption does not apply to a person who is a community care facility licensee or an employee of the facility.(H) A person similar to those described in paragraph (2), as defined by the department in regulation, is exempt from the requirements applicable under paragraph (1).(I) This paragraph does not prevent a licensee from requiring a criminal record clearance of any individual exempt from the requirements of this section, provided that the individual has client contact.(c) (1) (A) Subsequent to initial licensure, a person specified in subdivision (b) who is not exempted from fingerprinting shall obtain either a criminal record clearance or an exemption, pursuant to subdivision (f) of this section or Section 1522.7, from the State Department of Social Services prior to employment, residence, or initial presence in a facility. A person specified in subdivision (b) who is not exempt from fingerprinting shall be fingerprinted. The licensee shall submit these fingerprint images and related information to the Department of Justice and the Federal Bureau of Investigation, through the Department of Justice, for a state and federal level criminal offender record information search, or to comply with paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) prior to the person’s employment, residence, or initial presence in the residential care facility for the elderly. The department shall not require the person to disclose their criminal history information prior to receipt of live scan results.(B) These fingerprint images and related information shall be electronically transmitted in a manner approved by the State Department of Social Services and the Department of Justice. A licensee’s failure to submit fingerprint images and related information to the Department of Justice, or to comply with paragraph (1) of subdivision (g), as required in this section, shall result in the citation of a deficiency and an immediate assessment of civil penalties in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per violation per day for a maximum of five days, unless the violation is a second or subsequent violation within a 12-month period in which case the civil penalties shall be in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per violation for a maximum of 30 days, and shall be grounds for disciplining the licensee pursuant to Section 1569.50. The State Department of Social Services may assess civil penalties for continued violations as permitted by Section 1569.49. The licensee shall then submit these fingerprint images to the State Department of Social Services for processing. Documentation of the individual’s clearance or exemption shall be maintained by the licensee and be available for inspection. The Department of Justice shall notify the department, as required by Section 1522.04, and notify the licensee by mail within 14 days of electronic transmission of the fingerprints to the Department of Justice, if the person has no criminal record. A violation of the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 1522.04 shall result in the citation of a deficiency and an immediate assessment of civil penalties in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per violation per day for a maximum of five days, unless the violation is a second or subsequent violation within a 12-month period in which case the civil penalties shall be in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per violation for a maximum of 30 days, and shall be grounds for disciplining the licensee pursuant to Section 1569.50. The department may assess civil penalties for continued violations as permitted by Section 1569.49.(2) Within 14 calendar days of the receipt of the fingerprint images, the Department of Justice shall notify the State Department of Social Services of the criminal record information, as provided for in this subdivision. If no criminal record information has been recorded, the Department of Justice shall provide the licensee and the State Department of Social Services with a statement of that fact within 14 calendar days of receipt of the fingerprint images. If new fingerprint images are required for processing, the Department of Justice shall, within 14 calendar days from the date of receipt of the fingerprint images, notify the licensee that the fingerprint images were illegible.(3) Except for persons specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the licensee shall endeavor to ascertain the previous employment history of persons required to be fingerprinted under this subdivision. If the State Department of Social Services determines, on the basis of the fingerprint images submitted to the Department of Justice, that the person has been convicted of a sex offense against a minor, an offense specified in Section 243.4, 273a, 273ab, 273d, 273g, or 368 of the Penal Code, or a felony, the State Department of Social Services shall notify the licensee in writing within 15 calendar days of the receipt of the notification from the Department of Justice to act immediately to terminate the person’s employment, remove the person from the residential care facility for the elderly, or bar the person from entering the residential care facility for the elderly. The State Department of Social Services may subsequently grant an exemption pursuant to subdivision (f). If the conviction was for another crime, except an infraction, the licensee shall, upon notification by the State Department of Social Services, act immediately to either (1) terminate the person’s employment, remove the person from the residential care facility for the elderly, or bar the person from entering the residential care facility for the elderly or (2) seek an exemption pursuant to subdivision (f). The department shall determine if the person shall be allowed to remain in the facility until a decision on the exemption is rendered by the department. A licensee’s failure to comply with the department’s prohibition of employment, contact with clients, or presence in the facility as required by this paragraph shall result in a citation of deficiency and an immediate assessment of civil penalties by the department against the licensee, in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per violation per day for a maximum of five days, unless the violation is a second or subsequent violation within a 12-month period in which case the civil penalties shall be in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per violation for a maximum of 30 days, and shall be grounds for disciplining the licensee pursuant to Section 1569.50.(4) The department may issue an exemption on its own motion pursuant to subdivision (f) if the person’s criminal history indicates that the person is of good character based on the age, seriousness, and frequency of the conviction or convictions. The department, in consultation with interested parties, shall develop regulations to establish the criteria to grant an exemption pursuant to this paragraph.(5) Concurrently with notifying the licensee pursuant to paragraph (4), the department shall notify the affected individual of the right to seek an exemption pursuant to subdivision (f). The individual may seek an exemption only if the licensee terminates the person’s employment or removes the person from the facility after receiving notice from the department pursuant to paragraph (4).(d) (1) For purposes of this section or any other provision of this chapter, a conviction means a plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere. Any action that the department is permitted to take following the establishment of a conviction may be taken when the time for appeal has elapsed, when the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of the sentence, notwithstanding a subsequent order pursuant to the provisions of Sections 1203.4 and 1203.4a of the Penal Code permitting a person to withdraw their plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment. For purposes of this section or any other provision of this chapter, the record of a conviction, or a copy thereof certified by the clerk of the court or by a judge of the court in which the conviction occurred, shall be conclusive evidence of the conviction. For purposes of this section or any other provision of this chapter, the arrest disposition report certified by the Department of Justice or documents admissible in a criminal action pursuant to Section 969b of the Penal Code shall be prima facie evidence of the conviction, notwithstanding any other law prohibiting the admission of these documents in a civil or administrative action.(2) For purposes of this section or any other provision of this chapter, the department shall consider criminal convictions from another state or federal court as if the criminal offense was committed in this state.(e) (1) The State Department of Social Services shall not use a record of arrest to deny, revoke, or terminate any application, license, employment, or residence unless the department investigates the incident and secures evidence, whether or not related to the incident of arrest, that is admissible in an administrative hearing to establish conduct by the person that may pose a risk to the health and safety of any person who is or may become a client.(2) The department shall not issue a criminal record clearance to a person who has been arrested for any crime specified in Section 290 of the Penal Code, or for violating Section 245, 273ab, or 273.5, or subdivision (b) of Section 273a of the Penal Code, or, prior to January 1, 1994, paragraph (2) of Section 273a of the Penal Code, or for any crime for which the department is prohibited from granting a record exemption pursuant to subdivision (f), prior to the department’s completion of an investigation pursuant to paragraph (1).(3) The State Department of Social Services is authorized to obtain any arrest or conviction records or reports from any law enforcement agency as necessary to the performance of its duties to inspect, license, and investigate community care facilities and individuals associated with a community care facility.(f) (1) After review of the record, the director may grant an exemption from disqualification for a license as specified in paragraphs (1) and (4) of subdivision (a), or for employment, residence, or presence in a residential care facility for the elderly as specified in paragraphs (4), (5), and (6) of subdivision (c) if the director has substantial and convincing evidence to support a reasonable belief that the applicant and the person convicted of the crime, if other than the applicant, are of such good character as to justify issuance of the license or special permit or granting an exemption for purposes of subdivision (c). However, an exemption shall not be granted pursuant to this subdivision if the conviction was for any of the following offenses:(A) An offense specified in Section 220, 243.4, or 264.1, subdivision (a) of Section 273a, or, prior to January 1, 1994, paragraph (1) of Section 273a, Section 273ab, 273d, 288, or 289, subdivision (c) of Section 290, or Section 368, of the Penal Code, or was a conviction of another crime against an individual specified in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code.(B) A felony offense specified in Section 729 of the Business and Professions Code or Section 206 or 215, subdivision (a) of Section 347, subdivision (b) of Section 417, or subdivision (a) of Section 451 of the Penal Code.(2) The director shall notify in writing the licensee or the applicant of their decision within 60 days of receipt of all information from the applicant and other sources determined necessary by the director for the rendering of a decision pursuant to this subdivision.(3) The department shall not prohibit a person from being employed or having contact with clients in a facility on the basis of a denied criminal record exemption request or arrest information unless the department complies with the requirements of Section 1569.58.(g) (1) For purposes of compliance with this section, the department may permit an individual to transfer a current criminal record clearance, as defined in subdivision (a), from one facility to another, as long as the criminal record clearance has been processed through a state licensing district office, and is being transferred to another facility licensed by a state licensing district office. The request shall be submitted to the department on a form provided by the department or submitted via the department’s secure online portal. Upon request of the licensee, who shall verify the individual’s identity, the department shall verify whether the individual has a clearance that can be transferred.(2) The State Department of Social Services shall hold criminal record clearances in its active files for a minimum of two years after an employee is no longer employed at a licensed facility in order for the criminal record clearances to be transferred under this section.(h) If a licensee or facility is required by law to deny employment or to terminate employment of any employee based on written notification from the department that the employee has a prior criminal conviction or is determined unsuitable for employment under Section 1569.58, the licensee or facility shall not incur civil liability or unemployment insurance liability as a result of that denial or termination.(i) Notwithstanding any other law, the department may provide an individual with a copy of their state or federal level criminal offender record information search response as provided to that department by the Department of Justice if the department has denied a criminal background clearance based on this information and the individual makes a written request to the department for a copy specifying an address to which it is to be sent. The state or federal level criminal offender record information search response shall not be modified or altered from its form or content as provided by the Department of Justice and shall be provided to the address specified by the individual in their written request. The department shall retain a copy of the individual’s written request and the response and date provided.SEC. 16.SEC. 17. Section 1596.871 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:1596.871. The Legislature recognizes the need to generate timely and accurate positive fingerprint identification of applicants as a condition of issuing licenses, permits, or certificates of approval for persons to operate or provide direct care services in a childcare center or family childcare home. It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to require the fingerprints of those individuals whose contact with child day care facility clients may pose a risk to the children’s health and safety. An individual shall be required to obtain either a criminal record clearance or a criminal record exemption from the State Department of Social Services before the individual’s initial presence in a child day care facility.(a) (1) Before and, as applicable, subsequent to issuing a license or special permit to any person to operate or manage a day care facility, the department shall secure from an appropriate law enforcement agency a criminal record to determine whether the applicant or any other person specified in subdivision (b) has ever been convicted of a crime other than an infraction or arrested for any crime specified in subdivision (c) of Section 290 of the Penal Code, or for violating Section 245, 273ab, or 273.5, subdivision (b) of Section 273a, or, prior to January 1, 1994, paragraph (2) of Section 273a, of the Penal Code, or for any crime for which the department is prohibited from granting a criminal record exemption pursuant to subdivision (f).(2) The criminal history information shall include the full criminal record, if any, of those persons, and subsequent arrest information pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code.(3) The following shall apply to the criminal record information:(A) If the State Department of Social Services finds that the applicant or any other person specified in subdivision (b) has been convicted of a crime, other than an infraction, the application shall be denied, unless the director grants an exemption pursuant to subdivision (f) of this section or Section 1522.7.(B) If the State Department of Social Services finds that the applicant, or any other person specified in subdivision (b), is awaiting trial for a crime other than an infraction, the State Department of Social Services may cease processing the criminal record information until the conclusion of the trial.(C) If no criminal record information has been recorded, the Department of Justice shall provide the applicant and the State Department of Social Services with a statement of that fact.(D) If the State Department of Social Services finds after licensure that the licensee, or any other person specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), has been convicted of a crime other than an infraction, the license may be revoked, unless the director grants an exemption pursuant to subdivision (f).(E) An applicant and any other person specified in subdivision (b) shall submit fingerprint images and related information to the Department of Justice and the Federal Bureau of Investigation, through the Department of Justice, for a state and federal level criminal offender record information search, in addition to the search required by subdivision (a). If, after licensure, the department determines that the licensee or person specified in subdivision (b) has a criminal record, the license may be revoked pursuant to Section 1596.885. The department may also suspend the license pending an administrative hearing pursuant to Section 1596.886.(b) (1) In addition to the applicant, this section shall be applicable to criminal record clearances and exemptions for the following persons:(A) An administrator, supervisor, manager, or director of the facility, or an individual acting in these roles, and an adult responsible for administration, operation of the facility, or direct supervision of staff.(B) A person, other than a child, residing in the facility.(C) A person who provides care and supervision to the children.(D) An adult or minor who is a staff person, volunteer, service provider, or employee who has contact with the children.(i) A volunteer or service provider providing time-limited specialized services shall be exempt from the requirements of this subdivision if this person is directly supervised by the licensee or a facility employee with a criminal record clearance or exemption, the person spends no more than 16 hours per week at the facility, and the person is not left alone with children in care.(ii) A student enrolled or participating at an accredited educational institution shall be exempt from the requirements of this subdivision if the student is directly supervised by the licensee or a facility employee with a criminal record clearance or exemption, the facility has an agreement with the educational institution concerning the placement of the student, the student spends no more than 16 hours per week at the facility, and the student is not left alone with children in care.(iii) A volunteer who is a relative, legal guardian, or foster parent of a client in the facility is exempt from the requirements of this subdivision if they are not left alone unsupervised with other children in care.(iv) A contracted repair person or vendor retained by the facility is exempt from the requirements of this subdivision if they are not left alone with children in care.(v) A person similar to those described in clauses (i) to (iv), inclusive, as defined by the department in regulation, is exempt from the requirements of this subdivision.(E) If the applicant is a firm, partnership, association, limited liability company, or corporation, the chief executive officer and members of the board of directors, or the governing body, and an individual responsible or accountable for the operation of the facility.(F) If the applicant is a local educational agency, the president of the governing board, the school district superintendent, or a person designated to administer the operation of the facility, as designated by the local educational agency.(G) Officers of the governing body of the applicant, a person with a 10-percent or greater financial interest, and a person who exercises substantial influence over the operation of the facility.(H) This section does not apply to employees of childcare and development programs under contract with the State Department of Education who have completed a criminal record clearance as part of an application to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, and who possess a current credential or permit issued by the commission, including employees of childcare and development programs that serve both children subsidized under, and children not subsidized under, a State Department of Education contract. The Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall notify the department upon revocation of a current credential or permit issued to an employee of a childcare and development program under contract with the State Department of Education.(I) This section does not apply to employees of a childcare and development program operated by a school district, county office of education, or community college district under contract with the State Department of Education who have completed a criminal record clearance as a condition of employment. The school district, county office of education, or community college district upon receiving information that the status of an employee’s criminal record clearance has changed shall submit that information to the department.(2) This subdivision does not prevent a licensee from requiring a criminal record clearance of any individuals exempt from the requirements under this subdivision.(c) (1) (A) Subsequent to initial licensure, a person specified in subdivision (b) who is not exempt from fingerprinting shall obtain either a criminal record clearance or an exemption from disqualification, pursuant to subdivision (f) of this section or Section 1522.7, from the State Department of Social Services prior to employment, residence, or initial presence in the facility. A person specified in subdivision (b) who is not exempt from fingerprinting shall be fingerprinted. The licensee shall submit fingerprint images and related information to the Department of Justice and the Federal Bureau of Investigation, through the Department of Justice, or comply with paragraph (1) of subdivision (h), prior to the person’s employment, residence, or initial presence in the child day care facility. The department shall not require the person to disclose their criminal history information prior to receipt of live scan results.(B) These fingerprint images and related information shall be electronically submitted to the Department of Justice in a manner approved by the State Department of Social Services and the Department of Justice for the purpose of obtaining a permanent set of fingerprints. A licensee’s failure to submit fingerprint images and related information to the Department of Justice or to comply with paragraph (1) of subdivision (h), as required in this section, shall result in the citation of a deficiency, and an immediate assessment of civil penalties in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per violation per day for a maximum of five days, unless the violation is a second or subsequent violation within a 12-month period in which case the civil penalties shall be in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per violation for a maximum of 30 days, and shall be grounds for disciplining the licensee pursuant to Section 1596.885 or 1596.886. The State Department of Social Services may assess civil penalties for repeated or continued violations permitted by Sections 1596.99 and 1597.58. The fingerprint images and related information shall then be submitted to the department for processing. Within 14 calendar days of the receipt of the fingerprint images, the Department of Justice shall notify the State Department of Social Services of the criminal record information, as provided in this subdivision. If no criminal record information has been recorded, the Department of Justice shall provide the licensee and the State Department of Social Services with a statement of that fact within 14 calendar days of receipt of the fingerprint images. If new fingerprint images are required for processing, the Department of Justice shall, within 14 calendar days from the date of receipt of the fingerprint images, notify the licensee that the fingerprints were illegible.(C) Documentation of the individual’s clearance or exemption shall be maintained by the licensee, and shall be available for inspection. When live-scan technology is operational, as defined in Section 1522.04, the Department of Justice shall notify the department, as required by that section, and notify the licensee by mail within 14 days of electronic transmission of the fingerprints to the Department of Justice, if the person has no criminal record. Any violation of the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 1522.04 shall result in the citation of a deficiency and an immediate assessment of civil penalties in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per violation per day for a maximum of five days, unless the violation is a second or subsequent violation within a 12-month period in which case the civil penalties shall be in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per violation for a maximum of 30 days, and shall be grounds for disciplining the licensee pursuant to Section 1596.885 or 1596.886. The department may assess civil penalties for repeated or continued violations, as permitted by Sections 1596.99 and 1597.58.(2) Except for persons specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the licensee shall endeavor to ascertain the previous employment history of persons required to be fingerprinted under this subdivision. If it is determined by the department, on the basis of fingerprints submitted to the Department of Justice, that the person has been convicted of a sex offense against a minor, an offense specified in Section 243.4, 273a, 273ab, 273d, 273g, or 368 of the Penal Code, or a felony, the State Department of Social Services shall notify the licensee to act immediately to terminate the person’s employment, remove the person from the child day care facility, or bar the person from entering the child day care facility. The department may subsequently grant an exemption pursuant to subdivision (f). If the conviction was for another crime except an infraction, the licensee shall, upon notification by the State Department of Social Services, act immediately to either (1) terminate the person’s employment, remove the person from the child day care facility, or bar the person from entering the child day care facility; or (2) seek an exemption pursuant to subdivision (f). The department shall determine if the person shall be allowed to remain in the facility until a decision on the exemption is rendered. A licensee’s failure to comply with the department’s prohibition of employment, contact with clients, or presence in the facility as required by this paragraph shall result in a citation of deficiency and an immediate assessment of civil penalties by the department against the licensee, in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per violation per day for a maximum of five days, unless the violation is a second or subsequent violation within a 12-month period in which case the civil penalties shall be in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per violation for a maximum of 30 days, and shall be grounds for disciplining the licensee pursuant to Section 1596.885 or 1596.886.(3) The department may issue an exemption on its own motion pursuant to subdivision (f) if the person’s criminal history indicates that the person is of good character based on the age, seriousness, and frequency of the conviction or convictions. The department, in consultation with interested parties, shall develop regulations to establish the criteria to grant an exemption pursuant to this paragraph.(4) Concurrently with notifying the licensee pursuant to paragraph (3), the department shall notify the affected individual of the right to seek an exemption pursuant to subdivision (f). The individual may seek an exemption only if the licensee terminates the person’s employment or removes the person from the facility after receiving notice from the department pursuant to paragraph (3).(d) (1) For purposes of this section or any other provision of this chapter, a conviction means a plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere. Any action that the department is permitted to take following the establishment of a conviction may be taken when the time for appeal has elapsed, when the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, notwithstanding a subsequent order pursuant to Sections 1203.4 and 1203.4a of the Penal Code permitting the person to withdraw a plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment. For purposes of this section or any other provision of this chapter, the record of a conviction, or a copy thereof certified by the clerk of the court or by a judge of the court in which the conviction occurred, shall be conclusive evidence of the conviction. For purposes of this section or any other provision of this chapter, the arrest disposition report certified by the Department of Justice, or documents admissible in a criminal action pursuant to Section 969b of the Penal Code, shall be prima facie evidence of conviction, notwithstanding any other law prohibiting the admission of these documents in a civil or administrative action.(2) For purposes of this section or any other provision of this chapter, the department shall consider criminal convictions from another state or federal court as if the criminal offense was committed in this state.(e) (1) The State Department of Social Services shall not use a record of arrest to deny, revoke, or terminate any application, license, employment, or residence unless the department investigates the incident and secures evidence, whether or not related to the incident of arrest, that is admissible in an administrative hearing to establish conduct by the person that may pose a risk to the health and safety of any person who is or may become a client.(2) The department shall not issue a criminal record clearance to a person who has been arrested for any crime specified in Section 290 of the Penal Code, or for violating Section 245, 273ab, or 273.5, or subdivision (b) of Section 273a of the Penal Code, or, prior to January 1, 1994, paragraph (2) of Section 273a of the Penal Code, or for any crime for which the department is prohibited from granting a criminal record exemption pursuant to subdivision (f), prior to the department’s completion of an investigation pursuant to paragraph (1).(3) The State Department of Social Services is authorized to obtain any arrest or conviction records or reports from any law enforcement agency as necessary to the performance of its duties to inspect, license, and investigate community care facilities and individuals associated with a community care facility.(f) (1) After review of the record, the director may grant an exemption from disqualification for a license or special permit as specified in paragraphs (1) and (4) of subdivision (a), or for employment, residence, or presence in a child day care facility as specified in paragraphs (3), (4), and (5) of subdivision (c) if the director has substantial and convincing evidence to support a reasonable belief that the applicant and the person convicted of the crime, if other than the applicant, are of good character so as to justify issuance of the license or special permit or granting an exemption for purposes of subdivision (c). However, an exemption shall not be granted pursuant to this subdivision if the conviction was for any of the following offenses:(A) An offense specified in Section 220, 243.4, or 264.1, subdivision (a) of Section 273a, or, prior to January 1, 1994, paragraph (1) of Section 273a, Section 273ab, 273d, 288, or 289, subdivision (c) of Section 290, or Section 368, of the Penal Code, or was a conviction of another crime against an individual specified in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code.(B) A felony offense specified in Section 729 of the Business and Professions Code or Section 206 or 215, subdivision (a) of Section 347, subdivision (b) of Section 417, or subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 451 of the Penal Code.(2) The department shall not prohibit a person from being employed or having contact with clients in a facility on the basis of a denied criminal record exemption request or arrest information unless the department complies with the requirements of Section 1596.8897.(g) Upon request of the licensee, who shall enclose a self-addressed stamped postcard for this purpose, the Department of Justice shall verify receipt of the fingerprint images.(h) (1) For the purposes of compliance with this section, the department may permit an individual to transfer a current criminal record clearance, as defined in subdivision (a), from one facility to another, as long as the criminal record clearance has been processed through a state licensing district office, and is being transferred to another facility licensed by a state licensing district office. The request shall be submitted to the department on a form provided by the department or submitted via the department’s secure online portal. Upon request of the licensee, who shall verify the individual’s identity, the department shall verify whether the individual has a clearance that can be transferred.(2) The State Department of Social Services shall hold criminal record clearances in its active files for a minimum of two years after an employee is no longer employed at a licensed facility in order for the criminal record clearances to be transferred.(3) The following shall apply to a criminal record clearance or exemption from the department or a county office with department-delegated licensing authority:(A) A county office with department-delegated licensing authority may accept a clearance or exemption from the department.(B) The department may accept a clearance or exemption from any county office with department-delegated licensing authority.(C) A county office with department-delegated licensing authority may accept a clearance or exemption from any other county office with department-delegated licensing authority.(4) With respect to notifications issued by the Department of Justice pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code concerning an individual whose criminal record clearance was originally processed by the department or a county office with department-delegated licensing authority, all of the following shall apply:(A) The Department of Justice shall process a request from the department or a county office with department-delegated licensing authority to receive the notice, only if all of the following conditions are met:(i) The request shall be submitted to the Department of Justice by the agency to be substituted to receive the notification.(ii) The request shall be for the same applicant type as the type for which the original clearance was obtained.(iii) The request shall contain all prescribed data elements and format protocols pursuant to a written agreement between the department and the Department of Justice.(B) (i) On or before January 7, 2005, the department shall notify the Department of Justice of all county offices that have department-delegated licensing authority.(ii) The department shall notify the Department of Justice within 15 calendar days of the date on which a new county office receives department-delegated licensing authority or a county’s delegated licensing authority is rescinded.(C) The Department of Justice shall charge the department or a county office with department-delegated licensing authority a fee for each time a request to substitute the recipient agency is received for purposes of this paragraph. This fee shall not exceed the cost of providing the service.(i) Notwithstanding any other law, the department may provide an individual with a copy of the individual’s state or federal level criminal offender record information search response as provided to that department by the Department of Justice if the department has denied a criminal background clearance based on this information and the individual makes a written request to the department for a copy specifying an address to which it is to be sent. The state or federal level criminal offender record information search response shall not be modified or altered from its form or content as provided by the Department of Justice and shall be provided to the address specified by the individual in the individual’s written request. The department shall retain a copy of the individual’s written request and the response and date provided.(j) The State Department of Social Services may charge a reasonable fee for the costs of processing electronic fingerprint images and related information.SEC. 17.SEC. 18. Section 11105 of the Penal Code is amended to read:11105. (a) (1) The Department of Justice shall maintain state summary criminal history information.(2) As used in this section:(A) “State summary criminal history information” means the master record of information compiled by the Attorney General pertaining to the identification and criminal history of a person, such as name, date of birth, physical description, fingerprints, photographs, dates of arrests, arresting agencies and booking numbers, charges, dispositions, sentencing information, and similar data about the person.(B) “State summary criminal history information” does not refer to records and data compiled by criminal justice agencies other than the Attorney General, nor does it refer to records of complaints to or investigations conducted by, or records of intelligence information or security procedures of, the office of the Attorney General and the Department of Justice.(b) The Attorney General shall furnish state summary criminal history information to the following, if needed in the course of their duties, provided that when information is furnished to assist an agency, officer, or official of state or local government, a public utility, or any other entity, in fulfilling employment, certification, or licensing duties, Chapter 1321 of the Statutes of 1974 and Section 432.7 of the Labor Code shall apply:(1) The courts of the state.(2) Peace officers of the state, as defined in Section 830.1, subdivisions (a) and (e) of Section 830.2, subdivision (a) of Section 830.3, subdivision (a) of Section 830.31, and subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 830.5.(3) District attorneys of the state.(4) Prosecuting city attorneys or city prosecutors of a city within the state.(5) City attorneys pursuing civil gang injunctions pursuant to Section 186.22a, drug abatement actions pursuant to Section 3479 or 3480 of the Civil Code or Section 11571 of the Health and Safety Code, or a city attorney or county counsel pursuing gun violence restraining orders pursuant to Division 3.2 (commencing with Section 18100) of Title 2 of Part 6.(6) Probation officers of the state.(7) Parole officers of the state.(8) A public defender or attorney of record when representing a person in proceedings upon a petition for a certificate of rehabilitation and pardon pursuant to Section 4852.08.(9) A public defender or attorney of record when representing a person in a criminal case or a juvenile delinquency proceeding, including all appeals and postconviction motions, or a parole, mandatory supervision pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or postrelease community supervision revocation or revocation extension proceeding, if the information is requested in the course of representation.(10) An agency, officer, or official of the state if the state summary criminal history information is required to implement a statute or regulation that expressly refers to specific criminal conduct applicable to the subject person of the state summary criminal history information, and contains requirements or exclusions, or both, expressly based upon that specified criminal conduct. The agency, officer, or official of the state authorized by this paragraph to receive state summary criminal history information may perform state and federal criminal history information checks as provided for in subdivision (u). The Department of Justice shall provide a state or federal response to the agency, officer, or official pursuant to subdivision (p).(11) A city, county, city and county, or district, if access is needed in order to assist that agency in fulfilling employment, certification, or licensing duties, and if the access is specifically authorized by the city council, board of supervisors, or governing board of the city, county, or district if the state summary criminal history information is required to implement a statute, ordinance, or regulation that expressly refers to specific criminal conduct applicable to the subject person of the state summary criminal history information, and contains requirements or exclusions, or both, expressly based upon that specified criminal conduct. The city, county, city and county, or district authorized by this paragraph may also transmit fingerprint images and related information to the Department of Justice to be transmitted to the Federal Bureau of Investigation.(12) The subject of the state summary criminal history information under procedures established under Article 5 (commencing with Section 11120).(13) A person or entity when access is expressly authorized by statute if the criminal history information is required to implement a statute or regulation that expressly refers to specific criminal conduct applicable to the subject person of the state summary criminal history information, and contains requirements or exclusions, or both, expressly based upon that specified criminal conduct.(14) Health officers of a city, county, city and county, or district when in the performance of their official duties enforcing Section 120175 of the Health and Safety Code.(15) A managing or supervising correctional officer of a county jail or other county correctional facility.(16) A humane society, or society for the prevention of cruelty to animals, for the specific purpose of complying with Section 14502 of the Corporations Code for the appointment of humane officers.(17) Local child support agencies established by Section 17304 of the Family Code. When a local child support agency closes a support enforcement case containing state summary criminal history information, the agency shall delete or purge from the file and destroy documents or information concerning or arising from offenses for or of which the parent has been arrested, charged, or convicted, other than for offenses related to the parent’s having failed to provide support for minor children, consistent with the requirements of Section 17531 of the Family Code.(18) County child welfare agency personnel who have been delegated the authority of county probation officers to access state summary criminal history information pursuant to Section 272 of the Welfare and Institutions Code for the purposes specified in Section 16504.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Information from criminal history records provided pursuant to this subdivision shall not be used for a purpose other than those specified in this section and Section 16504.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. When an agency obtains records both on the basis of name checks and fingerprint checks, final placement decisions shall be based only on the records obtained pursuant to the fingerprint check.(19) The court of a tribe, or court of a consortium of tribes, that has entered into an agreement with the state pursuant to Section 10553.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. This information may be used only for the purposes specified in Section 16504.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and for tribal approval or tribal licensing of foster care or adoptive homes. Article 6 (commencing with Section 11140) shall apply to officers, members, and employees of a tribal court receiving state summary criminal history information pursuant to this section.(20) Child welfare agency personnel of a tribe or consortium of tribes that has entered into an agreement with the state pursuant to Section 10553.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and to whom the state has delegated duties under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 272 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The purposes for use of the information shall be for the purposes specified in Section 16504.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and for tribal approval or tribal licensing of foster care or adoptive homes. When an agency obtains records on the basis of name checks and fingerprint checks, final placement decisions shall be based only on the records obtained pursuant to the fingerprint check. Article 6 (commencing with Section 11140) shall apply to child welfare agency personnel receiving criminal record offender information pursuant to this section.(21) An officer providing conservatorship investigations pursuant to Sections 5351, 5354, and 5356 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(22) A court investigator providing investigations or reviews in conservatorships pursuant to Section 1826, 1850, 1851, or 2250.6 of the Probate Code.(23) A person authorized to conduct a guardianship investigation pursuant to Section 1513 of the Probate Code.(24) A humane officer pursuant to Section 14502 of the Corporations Code for the purposes of performing the officer’s duties.(25) A public agency described in subdivision (b) of Section 15975 of the Government Code, for the purpose of oversight and enforcement policies with respect to its contracted providers.(26) (A) A state entity, or its designee, that receives federal tax information. A state entity or its designee that is authorized by this paragraph to receive state summary criminal history information also may transmit fingerprint images and related information to the Department of Justice to be transmitted to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of the state entity or its designee obtaining federal-level criminal offender record information from the Department of Justice. This information shall be used only for the purposes set forth in Section 1044 of the Government Code.(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “federal tax information,” “state entity” and “designee” are as defined in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3), respectively, of subdivision (f) of Section 1044 of the Government Code.(27) The director of the State Department of State Hospitals, or their designee, for use related to research and evaluation studies described in Section 4046 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and subject to the limitations described in that section.(c) The Attorney General may furnish state summary criminal history information and, when specifically authorized by this subdivision, federal-level criminal history information upon a showing of a compelling need to any of the following, provided that when information is furnished to assist an agency, officer, or official of state or local government, a public utility, or any other entity in fulfilling employment, certification, or licensing duties, Chapter 1321 of the Statutes of 1974 and Section 432.7 of the Labor Code shall apply:(1) A public utility, as defined in Section 216 of the Public Utilities Code, that operates a nuclear energy facility when access is needed in order to assist in employing persons to work at the facility, provided that, if the Attorney General supplies the data, the Attorney General shall furnish a copy of the data to the person to whom the data relates.(2) A peace officer of the state other than those included in subdivision (b).(3) An illegal dumping enforcement officer as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 830.7.(4) A peace officer of another country.(5) Public officers, other than peace officers, of the United States, other states, or possessions or territories of the United States, provided that access to records similar to state summary criminal history information is expressly authorized by a statute of the United States, other states, or possessions or territories of the United States if the information is needed for the performance of their official duties.(6) A person when disclosure is requested by a probation, parole, or peace officer with the consent of the subject of the state summary criminal history information and for purposes of furthering the rehabilitation of the subject.(7) The courts of the United States, other states, or territories or possessions of the United States.(8) Peace officers of the United States, other states, tribes in other states, or territories or possessions of the United States.(9) An individual who is the subject of the record requested if needed in conjunction with an application to enter the United States or a foreign nation.(10) (A) (i) A public utility, as defined in Section 216 of the Public Utilities Code, or a cable corporation as defined in subparagraph (B), if receipt of criminal history information is needed in order to assist in employing current or prospective employees, contract employees, or subcontract employees who, in the course of their employment, may be seeking entrance to private residences or adjacent grounds. The information provided shall be limited to the record of convictions and arrests for which the person is released on bail or on their own recognizance pending trial.(ii) If the Attorney General supplies the data pursuant to this paragraph, the Attorney General shall furnish a copy of the data to the current or prospective employee to whom the data relates.(iii) State summary criminal history information is confidential and the receiving public utility or cable corporation shall not disclose its contents, other than for the purpose for which it was acquired. The state summary criminal history information in the possession of the public utility or cable corporation and all copies made from it shall be destroyed not more than 30 days after employment or promotion or transfer is denied or granted, except for those cases where a current or prospective employee is out on bail or on their own recognizance pending trial, in which case the state summary criminal history information and all copies shall be destroyed not more than 30 days after the case is resolved.(iv) A violation of this paragraph is a misdemeanor, and shall give the current or prospective employee who is injured by the violation a cause of action against the public utility or cable corporation to recover damages proximately caused by the violations. A public utility’s or cable corporation’s request for state summary criminal history information for purposes of employing current or prospective employees who may be seeking entrance to private residences or adjacent grounds in the course of their employment shall be deemed a “compelling need” as required to be shown in this subdivision.(v) This section shall not be construed as imposing a duty upon public utilities or cable corporations to request state summary criminal history information on current or prospective employees.(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “cable corporation” means a corporation or firm that transmits or provides television, computer, or telephone services by cable, digital, fiber optic, satellite, or comparable technology to subscribers for a fee.(C) Requests for federal-level criminal history information received by the Department of Justice from entities authorized pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation by the Department of Justice. Federal-level criminal history information received or compiled by the Department of Justice may then be disseminated to the entities referenced in subparagraph (A), as authorized by law.(11) A campus of the California State University or the University of California, or a four-year college or university accredited by a regional accreditation organization approved by the United States Department of Education, if needed in conjunction with an application for admission by a convicted felon to a special education program for convicted felons, including, but not limited to, university alternatives and halfway houses. Only conviction information shall be furnished. The college or university may require the convicted felon to be fingerprinted, and any inquiry to the department under this section shall include the convicted felon’s fingerprints and any other information specified by the department.(12) A foreign government, if requested by the individual who is the subject of the record requested, if needed in conjunction with the individual’s application to adopt a minor child who is a citizen of that foreign nation. Requests for information pursuant to this paragraph shall be in accordance with the process described in Sections 11122 to 11124, inclusive. The response shall be provided to the foreign government or its designee and to the individual who requested the information.(d) Whenever an authorized request for state summary criminal history information pertains to a person whose fingerprints are on file with the Department of Justice and the department has no criminal history of that person, and the information is to be used for employment, licensing, or certification purposes, the fingerprint card accompanying the request for information, if any, may be stamped “no criminal record” and returned to the person or entity making the request.(e) Whenever state summary criminal history information is furnished as the result of an application and is to be used for employment, licensing, or certification purposes, the Department of Justice may charge the person or entity making the request a fee that it determines to be sufficient to reimburse the department for the cost of furnishing the information. In addition, the Department of Justice may add a surcharge to the fee to fund maintenance and improvements to the systems from which the information is obtained. Notwithstanding any other law, a person or entity required to pay a fee to the department for information received under this section may charge the applicant a fee sufficient to reimburse the person or entity for this expense. All moneys received by the department pursuant to this section, Sections 11105.3 and 26190, and former Section 13588 of the Education Code shall be deposited in a special account in the General Fund to be available for expenditure by the department to offset costs incurred pursuant to those sections and for maintenance and improvements to the systems from which the information is obtained upon appropriation by the Legislature.(f) Whenever there is a conflict, the processing of criminal fingerprints and fingerprints of applicants for security guard or alarm agent registrations or firearms qualification permits submitted pursuant to Section 7583.9, 7583.23, 7596.3, or 7598.4 of the Business and Professions Code shall take priority over the processing of other applicant fingerprints.(g) It is not a violation of this section to disseminate statistical or research information obtained from a record, provided that the identity of the subject of the record is not disclosed.(h) It is not a violation of this section to include information obtained from a record in (1) a transcript or record of a judicial or administrative proceeding or (2) any other public record if the inclusion of the information in the public record is authorized by a court, statute, or decisional law.(i) Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Justice or a state or local law enforcement agency may require the submission of fingerprints for the purpose of conducting state summary criminal history information checks that are authorized by law.(j) The state summary criminal history information shall include any finding of mental incompetence pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1367) of Title 10 of Part 2 arising out of a complaint charging a felony offense specified in Section 290.(k) (1) This subdivision shall apply whenever state or federal summary criminal history information is furnished by the Department of Justice in accordance with federal law and as the result of an application by an authorized agency or organization and the information is to be used for peace officer employment or certification purposes. As used in this subdivision, a peace officer is defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2.(2) Notwithstanding any other law, whenever state or federal summary criminal history information is initially furnished pursuant to paragraph (1), the Department of Justice shall disseminate the following information:(A) Every conviction rendered against the applicant.(B) Every arrest for an offense for which the applicant is presently awaiting trial, whether the applicant is incarcerated or has been released on bail or on their own recognizance pending trial.(C) Every arrest or detention, except for an arrest or detention resulting in an exoneration, provided, however, that where the records of the Department of Justice do not contain a disposition for the arrest, the Department of Justice first makes a genuine effort to determine the disposition of the arrest.(D) Every successful diversion.(E) Every date and agency name associated with all retained peace officer or nonsworn law enforcement agency employee preemployment criminal offender record information search requests.(F) Sex offender registration status of the applicant.(G) Sentencing information, if present in the department’s records at the time of the response.(l) (1) This subdivision shall apply whenever state or federal summary criminal history information is furnished by the Department of Justice in accordance with federal law and as the result of an application by a criminal justice agency or organization as defined in Section 13101, and the information is to be used for criminal justice employment, licensing, or certification purposes.(2) Notwithstanding any other law, whenever state or federal summary criminal history information is initially furnished pursuant to paragraph (1), the Department of Justice shall disseminate the following information:(A) Every conviction rendered against the applicant.(B) Every arrest for an offense for which the applicant is presently awaiting trial, whether the applicant is incarcerated or has been released on bail or on their own recognizance pending trial.(C) Every arrest for an offense for which the records of the Department of Justice do not contain a disposition or that did not result in a conviction, provided that the Department of Justice first makes a genuine effort to determine the disposition of the arrest. However, information concerning an arrest shall not be disclosed if the records of the Department of Justice indicate or if the genuine effort reveals that the subject was exonerated, successfully completed a diversion or deferred entry of judgment program, or the arrest was deemed a detention, or the subject was granted relief pursuant to Section 851.91.(D) Every date and agency name associated with all retained peace officer or nonsworn law enforcement agency employee preemployment criminal offender record information search requests.(E) Sex offender registration status of the applicant.(F) Sentencing information, if present in the department’s records at the time of the response.(m) (1) This subdivision shall apply whenever state or federal summary criminal history information is furnished by the Department of Justice in accordance with federal law and as the result of an application by an authorized agency or organization pursuant to Section 1522, 1568.09, 1569.17, or 1596.871 of the Health and Safety Code, or a statute that incorporates the criteria of any of those sections or this subdivision by reference, and the information is to be used for employment, licensing, or certification purposes.(2) Notwithstanding any other law, whenever state or federal summary criminal history information is initially furnished pursuant to paragraph (1), the Department of Justice shall disseminate the following information:(A) Every conviction of an offense rendered against the applicant, except a conviction for which relief has been granted pursuant to Section 1203.49.(B) Every arrest for an offense for which the applicant is presently awaiting trial, whether the applicant is incarcerated or has been released on bail or on their own recognizance pending trial.(C) Every arrest for an offense for which the State Department of Social Services is required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code to determine if an applicant has been arrested. However, if the records of the Department of Justice do not contain a disposition for an arrest, the Department of Justice shall first make a genuine effort to determine the disposition of the arrest.(D) Sex offender registration status of the applicant.(E) Sentencing information, if present in the department’s records at the time of the response.(3) Notwithstanding the requirements of the sections referenced in paragraph (1) of this subdivision, the Department of Justice shall not disseminate information about an arrest subsequently deemed a detention or an arrest that resulted in the successful completion of a diversion program, exoneration, or a grant of relief pursuant to Section 851.91.(n) (1) This subdivision shall apply whenever state or federal summary criminal history information, to be used for employment, licensing, or certification purposes, is furnished by the Department of Justice in accordance with federal law and as the result of an application by an authorized agency, organization, or individual pursuant to any of the following:(A) Paragraph (10) of subdivision (c), when the information is to be used by a cable corporation.(B) Section 11105.3 or 11105.4.(C) Section 15660 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(D) A statute that incorporates the criteria of any of the statutory provisions listed in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C), or of this subdivision, by reference.(2) Notwithstanding any other law, whenever state or federal summary criminal history information is initially furnished pursuant to paragraph (1), the Department of Justice shall disseminate the following information:(A) Every conviction, except a conviction for which relief has been granted pursuant to Section 1203.49, rendered against the applicant for a violation or attempted violation of an offense specified in subdivision (a) of Section 15660 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. However, with the exception of those offenses for which registration is required pursuant to Section 290, the Department of Justice shall not disseminate information pursuant to this subdivision unless the conviction occurred within 10 years of the date of the agency’s request for information or the conviction is over 10 years old but the subject of the request was incarcerated within 10 years of the agency’s request for information.(B) Every arrest for a violation or attempted violation of an offense specified in subdivision (a) of Section 15660 of the Welfare and Institutions Code for which the applicant is presently awaiting trial, whether the applicant is incarcerated or has been released on bail or on their own recognizance pending trial.(C) Sex offender registration status of the applicant.(D) Sentencing information, if present in the department’s records at the time of the response.(o) (1) This subdivision shall apply whenever state or federal summary criminal history information is furnished by the Department of Justice in accordance with federal law and as the result of an application by an authorized agency or organization pursuant to Section 379 or 1300 of the Financial Code or a statute that incorporates the criteria of either of those sections or this subdivision by reference, and the information is to be used for employment, licensing, or certification purposes.(2) Notwithstanding any other law, whenever state or federal summary criminal history information is initially furnished pursuant to paragraph (1), the Department of Justice shall disseminate the following information:(A) Every conviction rendered against the applicant for a violation or attempted violation of an offense specified in Section 1300 of the Financial Code, except a conviction for which relief has been granted pursuant to Section 1203.49.(B) Every arrest for a violation or attempted violation of an offense specified in Section 1300 of the Financial Code for which the applicant is presently awaiting trial, whether the applicant is incarcerated or has been released on bail or on their own recognizance pending trial.(C) Sentencing information, if present in the department’s records at the time of the response.(p) (1) This subdivision shall apply whenever state or federal criminal history information is furnished by the Department of Justice in accordance with federal law and as the result of an application by an agency, organization, or individual not defined in subdivision (k), (l), (m), (n), or (o), or a statute that incorporates the criteria of that section or this subdivision by reference, and the information is to be used for employment, licensing, or certification purposes.(2) Notwithstanding any other law, whenever state or federal summary criminal history information is initially furnished pursuant to paragraph (1), the Department of Justice shall disseminate the following information:(A) Every conviction rendered against the applicant, except a conviction for which relief has been granted pursuant to Section 1203.4, 1203.4a, 1203.41, 1203.42, 1203.425, 1203.44, or 1203.49. The Commission on Teacher Credentialing, school districts, county offices of education, charter schools, private schools, state special schools for the blind and deaf, or any other entity required to have a background check because of a contract with a school district, county office of education, charter school, private school, or state special school for the blind and deaf, shall receive every conviction rendered against an applicant, retroactive to January 1, 2020, regardless of relief granted pursuant to Section 1203.4, 1203.4a, 1203.41, 1203.42, 1203.425, or 1203.49.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) or any other law, information for a conviction for a controlled substance offense listed in Section 11350 or 11377, or former Section 11500 or 11500.5, of the Health and Safety Code that is more than five years old, for which relief is granted pursuant to Section 1203.4, 1203.4a, 1203.41, 1203.42, 1203.425, or 1203.49, shall not be disseminated.(C) Every arrest for an offense for which the applicant is presently awaiting trial, whether the applicant is incarcerated or has been released on bail or on their own recognizance pending trial.(D) Sex offender registration status of the applicant.(E) Sentencing information, if present in the department’s records at the time of the response.(q) All agencies, organizations, or individuals defined in subdivisions (k), (l), (m), (n), (o), and (p) may contract with the Department of Justice for subsequent notification pursuant to Section 11105.2. This subdivision shall not supersede sections that mandate an agency, organization, or individual to contract with the Department of Justice for subsequent notification pursuant to Section 11105.2.(r) This section does not require the Department of Justice to cease compliance with any other statutory notification requirements.(s) The provisions of Section 50.12 of Title 28 of the Code of Federal Regulations are to be followed in processing federal criminal history information.(t) Whenever state or federal summary criminal history information is furnished by the Department of Justice as the result of an application by an authorized agency, organization, or individual defined in subdivisions (k) to (p), inclusive, and the information is to be used for employment, licensing, or certification purposes, the authorized agency, organization, or individual shall expeditiously furnish a copy of the information to the person to whom the information relates if the information is a basis for an adverse employment, licensing, or certification decision. When furnished other than in person, the copy shall be delivered to the last contact information provided by the applicant.(u) (1) If a fingerprint-based criminal history information check is required pursuant to any statute, that check shall be requested from the Department of Justice and shall be applicable to the person identified in the referencing statute. The agency or entity identified in the statute shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice of the types of applicants identified in the referencing statute, for the purpose of obtaining information as to the existence and content of a record of state or federal convictions and state or federal arrests and also information as to the existence and content of a record of the state or federal arrests for which the Department of Justice establishes that the person is free on bail or on their own recognizance pending trial or appeal.(2) If requested, the Department of Justice shall transmit fingerprint images and related information received pursuant to this section to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of obtaining a federal criminal history information check. The Department of Justice shall review the information returned from the Federal Bureau of Investigation, and compile and disseminate a response to the agency or entity identified in the referencing statute, pursuant to the identified subdivision. The Department of Justice shall not disseminate federal criminal history information to a private entity that is unauthorized to receive it under federal law.(3) The Department of Justice shall provide a state response to the agency or entity identified in the referencing statute, pursuant to the identified subdivision.(4) The agency or entity identified in the referencing statute shall request from the Department of Justice subsequent notification service, as provided pursuant to Section 11105.2, for persons described in the referencing statute.(5) The Department of Justice shall charge a fee sufficient to cover the reasonable cost of processing the request described in this subdivision.SEC. 18.SEC. 19. Section 11105.003 is added to the Penal Code, to read:11105.003. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, any statutory requirement for an entity subject to any statutory requirement for an entity to conduct a federal criminal history information check for licensing, certification, or employment purposes does not apply if the Federal Bureau of Investigation has not authorized the entity to conduct a federal criminal history information check under the applicable federal laws and regulations.(b) Under these circumstances, an entity may make licensing, certification, or employment decisions based on the results of a state criminal history information check until the Federal Bureau of Investigation has authorized them to conduct a federal criminal history information check.(c) If the Federal Bureau of Investigation authorizes an entity to conduct the federal criminal history information check, the entity shall require an applicant, licensee, certified individual, and employee who did not previously undergo the federal criminal history information check to resubmit their fingerprints for that purpose.SEC. 19.SEC. 20. Section 11105.3 of the Penal Code is amended to read:11105.3. (a) (1) For the purposes of implementing the provisions of the National Child Protection Act, of 1993, as amended by the Volunteers for Children Act, the department shall develop the California Volunteer and Employee Criminal History Service Program pursuant to this section.(2) Notwithstanding any other law, a qualified entity may require a covered individual to undergo a fingerprint-based state and national criminal history background check.(3) The qualified entity shall submit to the department fingerprint images and related information for covered individuals who are subject to a state and national criminal history background check pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105. The department shall provide a state or federal response pursuant to subdivision (n) of Section 11105, except as otherwise specified.(4) A qualified entity shall request from the department subsequent notification service for covered individuals, pursuant to Section 11105.2.(b) (1) The department shall not require the applicant’s residence address for any request for records pursuant to subdivision (a). The department may charge a fee for the actual cost of processing the request. A fee shall not be charged to a nonprofit organization for requesting the state records of a covered individual pursuant to this section.(2) The following procedures are established under this section:(A) The department, upon receipt of a background check report lacking disposition data, shall conduct research in whatever recordkeeping systems are available in order to obtain complete data.(B) A qualified entity shall register with the department before submitting a request for screening under this section. Each such request shall be voluntary. As a part of the registration, the qualified entity shall agree to comply with state and federal law and shall so indicate by signing an agreement approved by the department. The department may periodically audit qualified entities to ensure compliance with federal and state laws and regulations.(C) The qualified entity shall maintain a waiver by the covered individual allowing the release of the state and federal level criminal history information to the qualified entity.(D) The federal level criminal history information is available to qualified entities to use only for the purpose of screening covered individuals. The department shall provide this federal criminal history record information directly to the qualified entity as authorized by the written waiver required pursuant to subparagraph (C) for submission of a request to the department.(E) The determination of whether the criminal history record shows that the covered individual has been convicted of, or is under pending indictment for, any crime that bears upon the fitness of the covered individual to have responsibility for the safety and well-being of children, the elderly, or individuals with disabilities shall solely be made by the qualified entity. This section does not require the department to make that determination on behalf of a qualified entity.(F) The qualified entity shall notify the person in writing of their right to obtain a copy of any background screening report, including the criminal history records, if any, contained in the report, to challenge the accuracy and completeness of any information contained in any such report, and to obtain a determination as to the validity of such challenge before a final determination regarding the person is made by the qualified entity reviewing the criminal history information.(c) This section does not supersede any law requiring criminal record access or dissemination of criminal history information. In any conflict with another statute, dissemination of criminal history information shall be pursuant to the mandatory statute. This subdivision applies to, but is not limited to, requirements pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 1500) of Chapter 3 of, and Chapter 3.2 (commencing with Section 1569) and Chapter 3.4 (commencing with Section 1596.70) of, Division 2 of, and Section 1522 of, the Health and Safety Code, and Sections 8712, 8811, and 8908 of the Family Code, and Section 16519.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(d) The department may adopt regulations to implement the provisions of this section as necessary.(e) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:(1) “Care” means the provision of services, treatment, education, training, instruction, supervision, or recreation to children, the elderly, or an individual with a disability.(2) “Child” means a person under 18 years of age.(3) “Covered individual” means a person who has or may have access to a person served by a qualified entity, and meets one of the following criteria:(A) Is a current or prospective employee or volunteer of a qualified entity.(B) Is a current or prospective owner or operator of a qualified entity.(4) “Elderly” means a person 60 years of age or older.(5) “Employee” means every person in the service of a qualified entity under any appointment or contract of hire or apprenticeship, express or implied, oral or written.(6) “Individual with a disability” means a person who has a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one or more major life activities, a person who has a history or record of a physical or mental impairment, or a person who is perceived by others as having a physical or mental impairment.(7) “Qualified entity” means a business or organization, whether public, private, for profit, not for profit, or voluntary, that provides care or licenses, certifies, or places others to provide care.(8) “Volunteer” means an individual who performs work without promise, expectation, or receipt of any compensation for any work performed.(f) Criminal history information obtained pursuant to this section is confidential and a recipient shall not disclose its contents other than for the purpose for which it was acquired.SEC. 20.SEC. 21. Section 23520 of the Penal Code is repealed.SEC. 21.SEC. 22. Section 23520 is added to the Penal Code, to read:23520. (a) An applicant for a certificate of eligibility, as defined in Section 26710, or a dangerous weapons license or permit, as defined in subdivision (b), issued by the Department of Justice shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for purposes of conducting a state and national criminal history background check, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105, and for the purpose of determining if the applicant is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm.(b) A dangerous weapons license or permit includes all of the following:(1) Assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle permit, as defined in Article 6 (commencing with Section 31000) of Chapter 2 of Division 10.(2) Short-barreled shotgun or rifle permit, as defined in Article 2 (commencing with Section 33300) of Chapter 8 of Division 10.(3) Destructive device permit, as defined in Article 3 (commencing with Section 18900) of Chapter 1 of Division 5 of Title 2.(4) Machinegun permit, as defined in Article 3 (commencing with Section 32650) of Chapter 6 of Division 10.(5) Machinegun license, as defined in Article 4 (commencing with Section 32700) of Chapter 6 of Division 10.(6) Tear gas permit, as defined in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 23000) of Division 11 of Title 3.(c) (1) The department shall review the state and federal response pursuant to subdivision (l) of Section 11105 for individuals specified in subdivision (a).(2) The department shall retain the fingerprint impressions for subsequent arrest notification pursuant to Section 11105.2.SEC. 22.SEC. 23. Section 5164 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:5164. (a) (1) A county, city, city and county, or special district shall not hire a person for employment, or hire a volunteer to perform services, at a county, city, city and county, or special district operated park, playground, recreational center, or beach used for recreational purposes, in a position having supervisory or disciplinary authority over a minor, if that person has been convicted of an offense specified in paragraph (2).(2) (A) A violation or attempted violation of Section 220, 261.5, former Section 262, 273a, 273d, or 273.5 of the Penal Code, or a sex offense listed in Section 290 of the Penal Code, except for the offense specified in subdivision (d) of Section 243.4 of the Penal Code.(B) A felony or misdemeanor conviction specified in subparagraph (C) within 10 years of the date of the employer’s request.(C) A felony conviction that is over 10 years old, if the subject of the request was incarcerated within 10 years of the employer’s request, for a violation or attempted violation of an offense specified in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 207) of Title 8 of Part 1 of the Penal Code, Section 211 or 215 of the Penal Code, wherein it is charged and proved that the defendant personally used a deadly or dangerous weapon, as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 12022 of the Penal Code, in the commission of that offense, Section 217.1 of the Penal Code, Section 236 of the Penal Code, an offense specified in Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 240) of Title 8 of Part 1 of the Penal Code, or an offense specified in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code, provided that a record of a misdemeanor conviction shall not be transmitted to the requester unless the subject of the request has a total of three or more misdemeanor convictions, or a combined total of three or more misdemeanor and felony convictions, for violations listed in this section within the 10-year period immediately preceding the employer’s request or has been incarcerated for any of those convictions within the preceding 10 years.(b) (1) To give effect to this section, a county, city, city and county, or special district shall require each prospective employee or volunteer described in subdivision (a) to undergo a fingerprint-based state or national criminal history background check.(2) A county, city, city and county, or special district shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for individuals specified in subdivision (a) who are subject to a state or national criminal history background check pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state or federal response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. A fee shall not be charged to the local agency for requesting the state records of a prospective volunteer pursuant to this subdivision.(3) A county, city, city and county, or special district may charge a prospective employee or volunteer described in subdivision (a) a fee to cover all of the county, city, city and county, or special district’s costs attributable to the requirements imposed by this section.SEC. 23.SEC. 24. Section 14043.38 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:14043.38. (a) Provider types are designated as “limited,” “moderate,” or “high” categorical risk by the federal government in Section 424.518 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The department shall, at minimum, utilize the federal regulations in determining a provider’s or applicant’s categorical risk.(b) In accordance with Section 455.450 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the department shall designate a provider or applicant as a “high” categorical risk if any of the following occur:(1) The department imposes a payment suspension based on a credible allegation of fraud, waste, or abuse.(2) The provider or applicant has an existing Medicaid overpayment based on fraud, waste, or abuse.(3) The provider or applicant has been excluded by the federal Office of the Inspector General or another state’s Medicaid program within the previous 10 years.(4) The department or the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services lifted a temporary moratorium within the previous six months for the particular provider type submitting the application, the applicant would have been prevented from enrolling based on that previous moratorium, and the applicant applies for enrollment as a provider at any time within six months from the date the moratorium was lifted.(c) If the department designates a provider or applicant as a “high” categorical risk, the department or the State Department of Public Health shall require the provider or applicant to undergo a fingerprint-based state and national criminal history background check by doing both of the following:(1) Conduct a criminal background check of the following persons:(A) The provider or applicant. If the provider or applicant is a nonprofit Drug Medi-Cal provider or applicant, the officers and executive director of the provider or applicant.(B) Any person with a 5-percent or greater direct or indirect ownership interest in the provider or applicant.(2) Require the following persons to submit a set of fingerprints within 30 days of the department’s or the State Department of Public Health’s request in a manner determined by the department or the State Department of Public Health:(A) The provider or applicant. If the provider or applicant is a nonprofit Drug Medi-Cal provider or applicant, the officers and executive director of the provider or applicant.(B) Any person with a 5-percent or greater direct or indirect ownership interest in the provider or applicant.(d) (1) The department or the State Department of Public Health shall require the applicant or provider to submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice for an individual specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) who is subject to a state and national criminal history background check pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.(2) The Department of Justice shall provide a state or federal level response to the department pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.(3) The department or the State Department of Public Health shall request from the Department of Justice subsequent notification service, as provided pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code, for persons described in paragraph (1).(4) The Department of Justice shall charge a fee sufficient to cover the cost of processing the request described in this section. That fee shall be paid by the subject of the criminal background check.(e) For persons subject to the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 15660, the procedure for obtaining and submitting fingerprints and notification by the Department of Justice of criminal record information set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 15660 shall apply instead of the procedure set forth in subdivision (d).(f) As used in this section, the following definitions shall apply:(1) “Applicant” means an individual, including an ordering, referring, or prescribing individual, entity, or person with ownership or control interest in the applicant entity, managing employee, or agent that applies for enrollment as a provider in the Medi-Cal program that is subject to federal screening level requirements under Sections 424.518 and 455.450 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(2) “Person with ownership or control interest,” “managing employee,” and “agent” have the same meanings as defined in Section 455.101 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(3) “Provider” means an individual, entity, person with ownership or control interest in the entity, managing employee, or agent that is enrolled in the Medi-Cal program that furnishes, directly or indirectly, including all ordering, referring, and prescribing, any service, good, supply, or merchandise to a Medi-Cal beneficiary whose enrollment is subject to federal screening level requirements under Sections 424.518 and 455.450 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.SEC. 24.SEC. 25. Section 16519.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:16519.5. (a) The State Department of Social Services, in consultation with county child welfare agencies, foster parent associations, and other interested community parties, shall implement a unified, family friendly, and child-centered resource family approval process to replace the existing multiple processes for licensing foster family homes, certifying foster homes by licensed foster family agencies, approving relatives and nonrelative extended family members as foster care providers, and approving guardians and adoptive families.(b) (1) Counties shall be selected to participate on a voluntary basis as early implementation counties for the purpose of participating in the initial development of the approval process. Early implementation counties shall be selected according to criteria developed by the department in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California. In selecting the five early implementation counties, the department shall promote diversity among the participating counties in terms of size and geographic location.(2) Additional counties may participate in the early implementation of the program upon authorization by the department.(3) The State Department of Social Services shall be responsible for all of the following:(A) Selecting early implementation counties, based on criteria established by the department in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California.(B) Establishing timeframes for participating counties to submit an implementation plan, enter into terms and conditions for early implementation participation in the program, train appropriate staff, and accept applications from resource families.(C) Entering into terms and conditions for early implementation participation in the program by counties.(4) Counties participating in the early implementation of the program shall be responsible for all of the following:(A) Submitting an implementation plan.(B) Entering into terms and conditions for early implementation participation in the program.(C) Consulting with the county probation department in the development of the implementation plan.(D) Training appropriate staff.(E) Accepting applications from resource families within the timeframes established by the department.(5) (A) Approved relatives and nonrelative extended family members, licensed foster family homes, or approved adoptive homes that have completed the license or approval process prior to statewide implementation of the program shall not be considered part of the program. The otherwise applicable assessment and oversight processes shall continue to be administered for families and facilities not included in the program.(B) Upon implementation of the program in a county, that county shall not accept new applications for the licensure of foster family homes, the approval of relative and nonrelative extended family members, or the approval of prospective guardians and adoptive homes.(6) The department may waive regulations that pose a barrier to the early implementation and operation of this program. The waiver of a regulation by the department pursuant to this section applies to only those counties or foster family agencies participating in the early implementation of the program and only for the duration of the program.(7) This subdivision is inoperative on January 1, 2017.(c) (1) For purposes of this article, “resource family” means an individual or family that has successfully met both the home environment assessment standards and the permanency assessment criteria adopted pursuant to subdivision (d) necessary for providing care for a child placed by a public or private child placement agency by court order, or voluntarily placed by a parent or legal guardian. A resource family shall demonstrate all of the following:(A) An understanding of the safety, permanence, and well-being needs of children who have been victims of child abuse and neglect, and the capacity and willingness to meet those needs, including the need for protection, and the willingness to make use of support resources offered by the agency, or a support structure in place, or both.(B) An understanding of children’s needs and development, effective parenting skills or knowledge about parenting, and the capacity to act as a reasonable, prudent parent in day-to-day decisionmaking.(C) An understanding of the role of the individual or family as a resource family and the capacity to work cooperatively with the agency, birth family, as appropriate, other resource families, and other service providers in implementing the child’s case plan and supporting transitions in placement settings or permanency.(D) The financial ability within the household to ensure the stability and financial security of the family. This requirement may be waived for relative and nonrelative extended family member resource families on a case-by-case basis. For purposes of this subparagraph, there is no minimum income requirement and an applicant who will rely on the funding described in subdivision (l) to meet additional household expenses incurred due to the placement of a child shall not, for this reason, be denied approval as a resource family.(E) An ability and willingness to provide a family setting that promotes normal childhood experiences that serves the needs of the child.(F) An ability and willingness to meet the needs of the child regardless of the child’s sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression, and that, should difficulties around these issues arise, a willingness to obtain resources offered by the county or foster family agency or other available resources to meet those needs.(2) For purposes of this article, and unless otherwise specified, references to a “child” include a “nonminor dependent” and “nonminor former dependent or ward,” as defined in subdivision (v) and paragraph (1) of subdivision (aa) of Section 11400.(3) There is no fundamental right to approval as a resource family. Emergency placement of a child pursuant to Section 309, 319, 361.45, or 727.05, or with a resource family applicant pursuant to subdivision (e), does not entitle an applicant to approval as a resource family.(4) (A) A resource family shall be considered eligible to provide foster care for children in out-of-home placement and approved for adoption and guardianship.(B) (i) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a county may approve a resource family to care for a specific child, as specified in the written directives or regulations adopted pursuant to this section. Child-specific approval shall be considered if the applicant is a relative or nonrelative extended family member who has an established and significant relationship with a child or a child is already placed in the home of the relative or nonrelative extended family member pursuant to subdivision (e) or Section 309, 319, 361.45, or 727.05.(ii) When child-specific approval is granted to a relative who has received a criminal records exemption pursuant to clause (iv) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code, the child’s placement shall be funded pursuant to Section 11461.3 and the relative shall not be eligible for federal financial participation while the child is placed with them.(iii) In the case of an Indian child for whom the child’s tribe is not exercising its right to approve a home, the county shall apply the prevailing social and cultural standards of the Indian community to resource family approval for that child, as required by subdivision (f) of Section 361.31 and the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.). The department shall engage in the tribal consultation process and develop regulations to implement this clause. Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement this clause through all-county letters or other similar instruction, and provide guidance to counties regarding consistent implementation of this clause.(5) For purposes of this article, “resource family approval” means that the applicant or resource family successfully meets the home environment assessment and permanency assessment standards. This approval is in lieu of a foster family home license issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, a certificate of approval issued by a licensed foster family agency, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 1506 of the Health and Safety Code, relative or nonrelative extended family member approval, guardianship approval, and the adoption home study approval.(6) Approval of a resource family does not guarantee an initial, continued, or adoptive placement of a child with a resource family or with a relative or nonrelative extended family member. Approval of a resource family does not guarantee the establishment of a legal guardianship of a child with a resource family.(7) (A) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, the county shall, consistent with Sections 1520.3 and 1558.1 of the Health and Safety Code, cease any further review of an application if the applicant has had a previous application denial by the department or a county within the preceding year, or if the applicant has had a previous rescission, revocation, or exemption denial or exemption rescission by the department or a county within the preceding two years.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), the county may continue to review an application if it has determined that the reasons for the previous denial, rescission, or revocation were due to circumstances and conditions that either have been corrected or are no longer in existence. If an individual was excluded from a resource family home or facility licensed by the department, the county shall cease review of the individual’s application unless the excluded individual has been reinstated pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 16519.6 of this code or pursuant to Section 1569.53, subdivision (h) of Section 1558, subdivision (h) of Section 1569.58, or subdivision (h) of Section 1596.8897, of the Health and Safety Code.(C) (i) The county may cease any further review of an application if, after written notice to the applicant, the applicant fails to complete an application without good faith effort and within 30 days of the date of the notice, as specified in the written directives or regulations adopted pursuant to this section.(ii) Clause (i) does not apply if a child is placed with the applicant pursuant to Section 309, 361.45, 727.05, or paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 16519.5.(D) The cessation of an application review pursuant to this paragraph does not constitute a denial of the application for purposes of this section or any other law.(E) For purposes of this section, the date of a previous denial, rescission, revocation, exemption denial or exemption rescission, or exclusion shall be either of the following:(i) The effective date of a final decision or order upholding a notice of action or exclusion order.(ii) The date on the notice of the decision to deny, rescind, revoke, or exclude if the notice was not appealed or otherwise constitutes a final decision.(8) A resource family shall meet the approval standards set forth in this section, and, as applicable, Chapter 6.3 (commencing with Section 18360) of Part 6, to maintain approval. A resource family shall comply with the written directives or regulations adopted pursuant to this section and applicable laws in order to maintain approval.(9) A resource family may be approved by a county child welfare department or a probation department pursuant to this section or by a foster family agency pursuant to Section 1517 of the Health and Safety Code.(10) A resource family shall not be licensed to operate a residential facility, as defined in Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code, a residential care facility for the elderly, as defined in Section 1569.2 of the Health and Safety Code, or a residential care facility for persons with chronic life-threatening illnesses, as defined in Section 1568.01 of the Health and Safety Code, on the same premises used as the residence of the resource family.(11) (A) An applicant who withdraws an application prior to its approval or denial may resubmit the application within 12 months of the withdrawal.(B) This paragraph does not preclude a county from requiring an applicant to complete an application activity, even if that activity was previously completed.(d) (1) The department shall adopt standards pertaining to the home environment and permanency assessments of a resource family.(2) Resource family home environment assessment standards shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(A) (i) (I) A criminal record clearance of each applicant and all adults residing in, or regularly present in, the home, and not exempted from fingerprinting, as set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code, pursuant to Section 8712 of the Family Code, utilizing a check of the Child Abuse Central Index pursuant to Section 1522.1 of the Health and Safety Code, and receipt of a fingerprint-based state and federal criminal offender record information search response. The criminal history information shall include subsequent notifications pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code.(II) Consideration of any substantiated allegations of child abuse or neglect against the applicant and any other adult residing in, or regularly present in, the home pursuant to Section 1522.1 of the Health and Safety Code.(III) If the criminal records check indicates that the person has been convicted of an offense described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code, home approval shall be denied unless the person has received a criminal records exemption pursuant to clause (iv) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code. If the criminal records check indicates that the person has been convicted of an offense described in subparagraph (B) or (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code, the home shall not be approved unless a criminal record exemption has been granted pursuant to subclause (IV).(IV) If the resource family parent, applicant, or any other person specified in subclause (I) has been convicted of a crime other than an infraction or arrested for an offense specified in subdivision (e) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code, except for the civil penalty language, the criminal background check provisions specified in subdivisions (d) through (f) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code shall apply. Exemptions from the criminal records clearance requirements set forth in this section may be granted by the department or the county, if that county has been granted permission by the department to issue criminal record exemptions pursuant to Section 361.4, using the exemption criteria currently used for foster care licensing, as specified in subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code.(V) If it is determined, on the basis of the fingerprint images and related information submitted to the Department of Justice, that subsequent to obtaining a criminal record clearance or exemption from disqualification, the person has been convicted of, or is awaiting trial for, a sex offense against a minor, or has been convicted for an offense specified in Section 243.4, 273a, 273ab, 273d, 273g, or 368 of the Penal Code, or a felony, the department or county shall notify the resource family to act immediately to remove or bar the person from entering the resource family’s home. The department or county, as applicable, may subsequently grant an exemption from disqualification pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code. If the conviction or arrest was for another crime, the resource family shall, upon notification by the department or county, act immediately to either remove or bar the person from entering the resource family’s home, or require the person to seek an exemption from disqualification pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code. The department or county, as applicable, shall determine if the person shall be allowed to remain in the home until a decision on the exemption from disqualification is rendered.(ii) For public foster family agencies approving resource families, the criminal records clearance process set forth in clause (i) shall be utilized.(iii) For private foster family agencies approving resource families, the criminal records clearance process set forth in clause (i) shall be utilized, as permitted by state and federal law.(B) A home and grounds evaluation to ensure the health and safety of children.(C) In addition to the foregoing requirements, the resource family home environment assessment standards shall require the following:(i) That the applicant demonstrates an understanding of the rights of children in care and the applicant’s responsibility to safeguard those rights.(ii) That the total number of children residing in the home of a resource family shall be no more than the total number of children the resource family can properly care for, regardless of status, and shall not exceed six children, unless exceptional circumstances that are documented in the foster child’s case file exist to permit a resource family to care for more children, including, but not limited to, the need to place siblings together, consistent with Section 16002.(iii)  That the applicant understands the applicant’s responsibilities with respect to acting as a reasonable and prudent parent, and maintaining the least restrictive environment that serves the needs of the child.(3) The resource family permanency assessment standards shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(A) Caregiver training, as described in subdivisions (g) and (h).(B) A family evaluation, which shall include, but not be limited to, interviews of an applicant to assess the applicant’s personal history, family dynamic, and need for support or resources, and a risk assessment.(i) When the applicant is a relative or nonrelative extended family member to an identified child, the family evaluation shall consider the nature of the relationship between the relative or nonrelative extended family member and the child. The relative or nonrelative extended family member’s expressed desire to only care for a specific child or children shall not be a reason to deny the approval.(ii) A caregiver risk assessment shall include, but not be limited to, physical and mental health, alcohol and other substance use and abuse, family and domestic violence, and the factors listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).(iii) A county may review and discuss data contained in the statewide child welfare database with an applicant for purposes of conducting a family evaluation, as specified in the written directives or regulations adopted pursuant to this section.(C) Completion of any other activities that relate to the ability of an applicant or a resource family to achieve permanency with a child.(4) (A) For a child placed on an emergency basis pursuant to Section 309, 361.45, or 727.05, the home environment assessment, the permanency assessment, and the written report shall be completed within 120 days of the placement, unless good cause exists based upon the needs of the child.(B) If additional time is needed to complete the home environment assessment or the permanency assessment, the county shall document the extenuating circumstances for the delay and generate a timeframe for the completion of those assessments.(C) The county shall report to the department, on a quarterly basis, the number of families with emergency placements whose home environment assessment or permanency assessment goes beyond 120 days and summarize the reasons for these delays.(e) (1) A county may place a child with a resource family applicant who has successfully completed the home environment assessment prior to completion of a permanency assessment only if a compelling reason for the placement exists based on the needs of the child.(A) The permanency assessment and the written report described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (g) shall be completed within 120 days of the child’s placement in the home, unless good cause exists.(B) If additional time is needed to comply with subparagraph (A), the county shall document the extenuating circumstances for the delay and generate a timeframe for the completion of the permanency assessment.(C) The county shall report to the department, on a quarterly basis, the number of applicants for whom the requirements of subparagraph (A) exceed 120 days and summarize the reasons for these delays.(2) The home environment and permanency assessments, and the written report described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (g), shall be completed within 120 days of a child’s placement with a relative or nonrelative extended family member pursuant to Section 309, 361.45, or 727.05, unless good cause exists.(3) For any placement made pursuant to this subdivision, AFDC-FC funding shall not be available until approval of the resource family has been completed.(4) A child placed pursuant to this subdivision shall be afforded all the rights set forth in Section 16001.9.(5) This section does not limit the county’s authority to inspect the home of a resource family applicant as often as necessary to ensure the quality of care provided.(6) This subdivision does not limit the county’s obligation under law to assess and give placement consideration to relatives and nonrelative extended family members and to place a child pursuant to Section 309, 361.3, 361.45, 706.6, or 727.1.(f) The State Department of Social Services shall be responsible for all of the following:(1) (A) Until regulations are adopted, administering the program through the issuance of written directives that shall have the same force and effect as regulations. Any directive affecting Article 1 (commencing with Section 700) of Chapter 7 of Division 1 of Title 11 of the California Code of Regulations shall be approved by the Department of Justice. The directives shall be exempt from the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).(B) Adopting, amending, or repealing, in accordance with Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, any reasonable rules, regulations, and standards that may be necessary or proper to carry out the purposes and intent of this article and to enable the department to exercise the powers and perform the duties conferred upon it by this section, consistent with the laws of this state.(2) Approving and requiring the use of a single standard for resource family approval.(3) Adopting and requiring the use of standardized documentation for the home environment and permanency assessments of resource families. The department shall permit counties to maintain documentation relating to the resource family approval process in an electronic format.(4) Adopting core competencies for county staff to participate in the assessment and evaluation of an applicant or resource family.(5) Requiring counties to monitor county-approved resource families, including, but not limited to, both of the following:(A) Investigating complaints regarding resource families.(B) Developing and monitoring resource family corrective action plans to correct identified deficiencies and to rescind resource family approval if compliance with corrective action plans is not achieved.(6) Ongoing oversight and monitoring of county systems and operations including all of the following:(A) Reviewing the county’s implementation plan and implementation of the program.(B) Reviewing an adequate number of county-approved resource families in each county to ensure that approval standards are being properly applied.(i) The review shall include case file documentation and may include onsite inspection of individual resource families.(ii) The review shall occur on a biennial basis and more frequently if the department becomes aware that a county is experiencing a disproportionate number of complaints against individual resource family homes.(C) Reviewing county reports of serious complaints and incidents involving resource families, as determined necessary by the department. The department may conduct an independent review of the complaint or incident and change the findings depending on the results of its investigation.(D) Investigating unresolved complaints against counties.(E) Requiring corrective action of counties that are not in full compliance with this section.(7) Excluding a resource family parent, applicant, or other individual from presence in any resource family home, consistent with the established standard for any of the reasons specified in Section 16519.61.(8) Implementing due process procedures, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(A) Providing a statewide fair hearing process for application denials, rescissions of approval, exclusion actions, or criminal record exemption denials or rescissions by a county or the department.(B) Providing an excluded individual with due process pursuant to Section 16519.6.(C) Amending the department’s applicable state hearing procedures and regulations or using the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), when applicable, as necessary for the administration of the program.(g) Counties shall be responsible for all of the following:(1) Submitting an implementation plan and consulting with the county probation department in the development of the implementation plan.(2) Complying with the written directives or regulations adopted pursuant to this section.(3) Implementing the requirements for resource family approval and utilizing standardized documentation established by the department. A county may maintain documentation relating to the resource family approval process in an electronic format.(4) Training appropriate staff, including ensuring staff have the education and experience or core competencies necessary to participate in the assessment and evaluation of an applicant or resource family.(5) (A) Taking the following actions, as applicable, for any of the reasons specified in Section 16519.61:(i) (I) Approving or denying resource family applications, including preparing a written report that evaluates an applicant’s capacity to foster, adopt, and provide legal guardianship of a child based on all of the information gathered through the resource family application and assessment processes.(II) The applicant’s preference to provide a specific level of permanency, including adoption, guardianship, or, in the case of a relative, placement with a fit and willing relative, shall not be a basis to deny an application.(ii) Rescinding approvals of resource families.(iii) When applicable, referring a case to the department for an action to exclude a resource family parent, applicant, or other individual from presence in any resource family home, consistent with the established standard.(iv) Issuing a temporary suspension order that suspends the resource family approval prior to a hearing when, in the opinion of the county, urgent action is needed to protect a child from physical or mental abuse, abandonment, or any other substantial threat to health or safety. The county shall serve the resource family with the temporary suspension order and a copy of available discovery in the possession of the county, including, but not limited to, affidavits, declarations, names of witnesses, and other evidence upon which the county relied in issuing the temporary suspension order. The temporary suspension order shall be served upon the resource family with a notice of action, and if the matter is to be heard before the Office of Administrative Hearings, an accusation. The temporary suspension order shall list the effective date on the order.(v) Granting, denying, or rescinding criminal record exemptions.(B) Providing a resource family parent, applicant, or individual who is the subject of a criminal record exemption denial or rescission with due process pursuant to Section 16519.6.(C) Notifying the department of any decisions denying an application for resource family approval, rescinding the approval of a resource family, or denying or rescinding a criminal record exemption and, if applicable, notifying the department of the results of an administrative action.(6) (A) Updating resource family approval biennially and as necessary to address any changes that have occurred in the resource family’s circumstances, including, but not limited to, moving to a new home location or commencing operation of a family daycare home, as defined in Section 1596.78 of the Health and Safety Code.(B) A county shall conduct an announced inspection of a resource family home during the biennial update, and as necessary to address any changes specified in subparagraph (A), in order to ensure that the resource family is conforming to all applicable laws and the written directives or regulations adopted pursuant to this section.(7) Monitoring resource families through all of the following:(A) Ensuring that social workers who identify a condition in the home that may not meet the approval standards set forth in subdivision (d) while in the course of a routine visit to children placed with a resource family take appropriate action as needed.(B) Requiring resource families to meet the approval standards set forth in this section and to comply with the written directives or regulations adopted pursuant to this section, other applicable laws, and corrective action plans as necessary to correct identified deficiencies. If corrective action is not completed, as specified in the plan, the county may rescind the resource family approval.(C) Requiring resource families to report any incidents consistent with the reporting requirements pursuant to the written directives or regulations adopted pursuant to this section.(D) Inspecting resource family homes as often as necessary to ensure the quality of care provided.(8) (A) Investigating all complaints against a resource family and taking action as necessary, including, but not limited to, investigating any incidents reported about a resource family indicating that the approval standard is not being maintained and inspecting the resource family home.(B) The child’s social worker shall not conduct the investigation into the complaint received concerning a family providing services pursuant to the standards required by subdivision (d). To the extent that adequate resources are available, complaints shall be investigated by a worker who did not conduct the home environment assessment or family evaluation or prepare the written report determining approval of the resource family.(C) Upon conclusion of the complaint investigation, the final disposition shall be reviewed and approved by a supervising staff member.(D) The department shall be notified of any serious incidents or serious complaints or any incident that falls within the definition of Section 11165.5 of the Penal Code. If those incidents or complaints result in an investigation, the department shall also be notified as to the status and disposition of that investigation.(9) Performing corrective action as required by the department.(10) Assessing county performance in related areas of the California Child and Family Services Review System, and remedying problems identified.(11) Submitting information and data that the department determines is necessary to study, monitor, and prepare the update specified in paragraph (7) of subdivision (f).(12) Ensuring resource family applicants and resource families have the necessary knowledge, skills, and abilities to support children of all races, ethnic group identifications, ancestries, national origins, colors, religions, sexes, sexual orientations, gender identities, mental or physical disabilities, or HIV statuses in foster care by completing caregiver training. The training should include a curriculum that supports the role of a resource family in parenting vulnerable children and should be ongoing in order to provide resource families with information on trauma-informed practices and requirements and other topics within the foster care system.(13) Ensuring that a resource family applicant completes a minimum of 12 hours of preapproval caregiver training. The training shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following courses:(A) An overview of the child protective and probation systems.(B) The effects of trauma, including grief and loss, and child abuse and neglect, on child development and behavior, and methods to behaviorally support children impacted by that trauma or child abuse and neglect.(C) Positive discipline and the importance of self-esteem.(D) Health issues in foster care.(E) Accessing services and supports to address education needs, physical, mental, and behavioral health, and substance use disorders, including culturally relevant services.(F) The rights of a child in foster care and the resource family’s responsibility to safeguard those rights, including the right to have fair and equal access to all available services, placement, care, treatment, and benefits, and to not be subjected to discrimination or harassment on the basis of actual or perceived race, ethnic group identification, ancestry, national origin, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, mental or physical disability, or HIV status.(G) Cultural needs of children, including instruction on cultural competency and sensitivity, and related best practices for providing adequate care for children or youth across diverse ethnic and racial backgrounds, as well as children or youth identifying as lesbian, gay, bisexual, or transgender.(H) Basic instruction on existing laws and procedures regarding the safety of foster youth at school.(I) Permanence, well-being, and education needs of children.(J) Child and adolescent development, including sexual orientation, gender identity, and expression.(K) The role of resource families, including working cooperatively with the child welfare or probation agency, the child’s family, other resource families, and other service providers implementing the case plan, to support case plan goals and objectives, including placement transition planning to reduce trauma during transitions to reunification or other placement settings.(L) The role of a resource family on the child and family team as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 16501.(M) A resource family’s responsibility to act as a reasonable and prudent parent, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 1522.44 of the Health and Safety Code, and to provide a family setting that promotes normal childhood experiences and that serves the needs of the child.(N) An overview of the specialized training identified in subdivision (h).(O) The information described in subdivision (i) of Section 16521.5. The program may use the curriculum created pursuant to subdivision (h), and described in subdivision (i), of Section 16521.5.(P) Information on providing care and supervision to children who have been commercially sexually exploited or who have been victims of child labor trafficking. For purposes of this subparagraph, “information” may include, but not be limited to, informational pamphlets addressing the identification of victims of commercial sexual exploitation and child labor trafficking and the provision of existing resources, including crisis hotline numbers, survivor and caregiver supports, and contact information for law enforcement entities.(14) Ensuring resource families complete a minimum of eight hours of caregiver training annually, a portion of which shall be from subparagraph (M) of paragraph (13) and from one or more of the other topics listed in paragraph (13).(15) (A) (i) Ensuring that resource families complete cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) training and first aid training, or demonstrate equivalent certification, no later than 90 days following resource family approval.(ii) A resource family parent who has a certificate of completion for Basic Life Support (BLS) for health care professionals, or Pediatric Advanced Life Support (PALS), or a higher standard of training that certifies CPR, and for whom the certification is currently active, is exempt from completing the resource family approval CPR training requirement as described in clause (i), upon demonstrating proof of certification of completion and until the date the certification expires.(iii) A resource family parent who has active and unrestricted licensure as a health care professional, issued by the Department of Consumer Affairs or the Emergency Medical Services Authority, is exempt from completing the resource family approval first aid training requirement as described in clause (i), upon demonstrating proof of active and unrestricted licensure and until the date the licensure expires.(B) (i) Ensuring that resource families, prior to expiration of the CPR and first aid certificates, obtain training to remain certified in CPR and first aid, or demonstrate equivalent certification, and submit copies of the certificates verifying completion of the training.(ii) Clause (i) does not apply to first aid training for a resource family parent who is exempt from the first aid training requirement pursuant to clause (iii) of subparagraph (A).(16) (A) Ensuring that resource families that care for children who are 10 years of age or older attend, within 12 months of approval as a resource family, a training on understanding how to use best practices for providing care and supervision to children who have been commercially sexually exploited or who have been victims of child labor trafficking. This training shall be survivor informed, culturally relevant and appropriate, and address issues relating to stigma. The training required by this subparagraph shall address all of the following topics:(i) Recognizing indicators of commercial sexual exploitation and child labor trafficking.(ii) Harm reduction.(iii) Trauma-informed care.(iv) Available county and state resources.(v) Perspectives of individuals or families who have experiences with commercial sexual exploitation and child labor trafficking.(B) The information provided in subparagraph (P) of paragraph (13) shall also be provided during the training described in this paragraph.(C) After completing the training required by subparagraph (A), a resource family shall not be required to attend training relating to children who have been commercially sexually exploited or who have been victims of child labor trafficking, except as required pursuant to subdivision (h).(D) This section does not prevent an entity from providing the training specified in this paragraph in person, virtually, by recorded means, or by any other available means.(h) In addition to any training required by this section, a county may require a resource family or applicant to receive relevant specialized training for the purpose of preparing the resource family to meet the needs of a particular child in care. This training may include, but is not limited to, the following:(1) Understanding how to use best practices for providing care and supervision to commercially sexually exploited children and children who have been victims of child labor trafficking.(2) Understanding how to use best practices for providing care and supervision to lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender children.(3) Understanding the requirements and best practices regarding psychotropic medications, including, but not limited to, court authorization, benefits, uses, side effects, interactions, assistance with self-administration, misuse, documentation, storage, and metabolic monitoring of children prescribed psychotropic medications.(4) Understanding the federal Indian Child Welfare Act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.), its historical significance, the rights of children covered by the act, and the best interests of Indian children, including the role of the caregiver in supporting culturally appropriate, child-centered practices that respect Native American history, culture, retention of tribal membership, and connection to the tribal community and traditions.(5) Understanding how to use best practices for providing care and supervision to nonminor dependents.(6) Understanding how to use best practices for providing care and supervision to children with special health care needs.(7) Understanding the different permanency options and the services and benefits associated with the options.(i) This section does not preclude a county from requiring training in excess of the requirements in this section.(j) (1) Resource families who move home locations shall retain their resource family status pending the outcome of the update conducted pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (g).(2) (A) If a resource family moves from one county to another county, the department, or the county to which a resource family has moved, shall submit a written request to the Department of Justice to transfer the individual’s subsequent arrest notification, as specified in subdivision (h) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code.(B) A request to transfer a subsequent arrest notification shall contain all prescribed data elements and format protocols pursuant to a written agreement between the department and the Department of Justice.(3) Subject to the requirements in paragraph (1), the resource family shall continue to be approved for guardianship and adoption. This subdivision shall not limit a county, foster family agency, or adoption agency from determining that the family is not approved for guardianship or adoption based on changes in the family’s circumstances or family evaluation.(k) Implementation of the program shall be contingent upon the continued availability of federal Social Security Act Title IV-E (42 U.S.C. Sec. 670) funds for costs associated with placement of children with resource families assessed and approved pursuant to the program.(l) A child placed with a resource family is eligible for the resource family basic rate, pursuant to Sections 11460, 11461, 11461.3, and 11463, at the child’s assessed level of care.(m) Sharing ratios for nonfederal expenditures for all costs associated with activities related to the approval of relatives and nonrelative extended family members shall be in accordance with Section 10101.(n) The Department of Justice shall charge fees sufficient to cover the cost of initial or subsequent criminal offender record information and Child Abuse Central Index searches, processing, or responses, as specified in this section.(o) Except as provided, resource families shall be exempt from both of the following:(1) Licensure requirements established pursuant to the California Community Care Facilities Act (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code) and all regulations promulgated to implement the act.(2) Relative and nonrelative extended family member approval requirements as those approval requirements existed prior to January 1, 2017.(p) (1) Early implementation counties shall be authorized to continue through December 31, 2016. The program shall be implemented by each county on or before January 1, 2017.(2) (A) (i) On and after January 1, 2017, a county to which the department has delegated its licensing authority pursuant to Section 1511 of the Health and Safety Code shall approve resource families in lieu of licensing foster family homes.(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), the existing licensure and oversight processes shall continue to be administered for foster family homes licensed prior to January 1, 2017, or as specified in subparagraph (C), until the license is revoked or forfeited by operation of law pursuant to Section 1517.1 of the Health and Safety Code.(B) (i) On and after January 1, 2017, a county shall approve resource families in lieu of approving relative and nonrelative extended family members.(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), the existing approval and oversight processes shall continue to be administered for relatives and nonrelative extended family members approved prior to January 1, 2017, or as specified in subparagraph (C), until the approval is revoked or forfeited by operation of law pursuant to this section.(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (D), a county shall approve or deny all applications for foster family home licenses and requests for relative or nonrelative extended family member approvals received on or before December 31, 2016, in accordance with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code or provisions providing for the approval of relatives or nonrelative extended family members, as applicable.(D) On and after January 1, 2017, a county shall not accept applications for foster family home licenses or requests to approve relatives or nonrelative extended family members.(3) No later than July 1, 2019, each county shall provide the following information to all licensed foster family homes and approved relatives and nonrelative extended family members licensed or approved by the county:(A) A detailed description of the resource family approval program.(B) Notification that, in order to care for a foster child, resource family approval is required by December 31, 2020.(C) Notification that a foster family home license and an approval of a relative or nonrelative extended family member shall be forfeited by operation of law, as specified in paragraph (8).(4) The following applies to all licensed foster family homes and approved relative and nonrelative extended family members:(A) A licensed foster family home or an approved relative or nonrelative extended family member with an approved adoptive home study completed prior to January 1, 2018, shall be deemed to be a resource family.(B) A licensed foster family home or an approved relative or nonrelative extended family member who had a child in placement at any time between January 1, 2017, and December 31, 2017, inclusive, may be approved as a resource family on the date of successful completion of a family evaluation.(C) A licensed foster family home that provided county-authorized respite services at any time between January 1, 2017, and December 31, 2017, inclusive, may be approved as a resource family on the date of successful completion of a family evaluation.(5) A county may provide supportive services to all licensed foster family homes, relatives, and nonrelative extended family members with a child in placement to assist with the resource family transition and to minimize placement disruptions.(6) (A) In order to approve a licensed foster family home or approved relative or nonrelative extended family member as a resource family pursuant to paragraph (4), a county shall submit a written request to the Department of Justice to transfer any subsequent arrest and Child Abuse Central Index notifications, as specified in subdivision (h) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code.(B) A request to transfer a subsequent arrest notification shall contain all prescribed data elements and format protocols pursuant to a written agreement between the department and the Department of Justice.(7) An individual who is a member of a resource family approved pursuant to subparagraph (B) or (C) of paragraph (4) shall be fingerprinted pursuant to Section 8712 of the Family Code upon filing an application for adoption.(8) All foster family licenses and approvals of relatives and nonrelative extended family members shall be forfeited by operation of law on December 31, 2020, except as provided in this paragraph or Section 1524 of the Health and Safety Code:(A) All licensed foster family homes that did not have a child in placement or did not provide county-authorized respite services at any time between January 1, 2017, and December 31, 2017, inclusive, shall forfeit the license by operation of law on January 1, 2018.(B) For foster family home licensees and approved relatives or nonrelative extended family members who have a pending resource family application on December 31, 2020, the foster family home license or relative and nonrelative extended family member approval shall be forfeited by operation of law upon approval as a resource family. If approval is denied, forfeiture by operation of law shall occur on the date of completion of any proceedings required by law to ensure due process.(C) A foster family home license shall be forfeited by operation of law, pursuant to Section 1517.1 of the Health and Safety Code, upon approval as a resource family.(D) Approval as a relative or nonrelative extended family member shall be forfeited by operation of law upon approval as a resource family.(q) On and after January 1, 2017, all licensed foster family agencies shall approve resource families in lieu of certifying foster homes, as set forth in Section 1517 of the Health and Safety Code.(r) The department may establish participation conditions, and select and authorize foster family agencies that voluntarily submit implementation plans and revised plans of operation in accordance with requirements established by the department, to approve resource families in lieu of certifying foster homes.(1) Notwithstanding any other law, a participating foster family agency shall require resource families to meet and maintain the resource family approval standards and requirements set forth in this chapter and in the written directives adopted consistent with the chapter prior to approval and in order to maintain approval.(2) A participating foster family agency shall implement the resource family approval program pursuant to Section 1517 of the Health and Safety Code.(3) This section does not limit the authority of the department to inspect, evaluate, or investigate a complaint or incident, or initiate a disciplinary action against a foster family agency pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 1550) of Chapter 3 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, or to take any action it may deem necessary for the health and safety of children placed with the foster family agency.(4) The department may adjust the foster family agency AFDC-FC rate pursuant to Section 11463 for implementation of this subdivision.(5) This subdivision is inoperative on January 1, 2017.(s) The department or a county is authorized to obtain any arrest or conviction records or reports from any court or law enforcement agency as necessary to the performance of its duties, as provided in this section or subdivision (e) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code.(t) A resource family approved pursuant to this section shall forfeit its approval concurrent with resource family approval by a foster family agency.SEC. 25.SEC. 26. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SEC. 26.SEC. 27. Any section of any act enacted by the Legislature during the 2026 calendar year that takes effect on or before January 1, 2027, and that amends, amends and renumbers, amends and repeals, adds, repeals and adds, or repeals a section that is amended, amended and renumbered, amended and repealed, added, repealed and added, or repealed by this act, shall prevail over this act, whether that act is chaptered before or after this act.SEC. 27.SEC. 28. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:In order to ensure state background check laws are in compliance with federal law, it is necessary that this bill take immediate effect.